


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft



























Cardiac Arrhythmia Service | Stanford Health Care













































































Share on Facebook


Twitter


Google+


Email




Close


Open




Close


Open












Close


Open




Close


Open






Share on Facebook


Twitter


Google+


Email












Menu



Search






Menu



Search









Doctors


Clinics & Locations


Conditions & Treatments


Patients & Visitors



MyHealth Login




















Billing


Insurance


Medical Records


Support Groups









Locations and Parking


Visiting Hours


Your Hospital Stay


International Patients







View All Information for Patients & Visitors »





We are available to assist you 24/7.


650-498-3333



GuestServices@stanfordhealthcare.org
















New to MyHealth?
Manage Your Care From Anywhere.
Access your health information from any device with MyHealth.  You can message your clinic, view lab results, schedule an appointment, and pay your bill.



Activate Your Account
with an access code or Create a New Account





MyHealth for Mobile
The MyHealth mobile app puts all your health information at your fingertips and makes managing your health care simple and quick.  Available for iPhone and Android.









            WELCOME BACK
        








Forgot ID or Forgot Password?

Need Help?
























Clear
























Cardiac Arrhythmia Service
Part of Cardiovascular Health








           We are with you every step of the way
           Watch Video











           We are with you every step of the way
           Watch Video






Experts in Arrhythmia Treatment
At Stanford, our electrophysiologists have an international reputation for treating people with atrial fibrillation and other arrhythmias, and they have invented many of today’s leading procedures.
Our team specializes in ablation, surgical therapies, device management, and treatment of inherited conditions.






 

Find a Doctor








                    Make an Appointment
            







Maps & Directions













WHAT WE OFFER FOR ARRHYTHMIA CARE





Specialized expertise in treating supraventricular arrhythmias, inherited arrhythmias, bradycardia, cardiomyopathy, and more. Go to Conditions Treated
Advanced treatments for ablation and surgical therapies, including access to clinical trials. Go to Treatments
Team-based approach to care that brings together doctors from multiple specialties. Go to Your Care Team
Comprehensive support services including nutrition and genetic counseling. Go to Support Services
Easy access to care with a single location for all services. Go to Accessing Care








COMMON CONDITIONS TREATED




To learn more about our care for the following conditions, please visit: 

Atrial fibrillation (AFib) »
Atrial flutter »
Ventricular arrhythmias »
Brugada syndrome »
Long QT syndrome »
Bradycardias (slow heart rhythms) »
Cardiomyopathy »

To see all conditions, Go to Conditions Treated



















                            Make An Appointment
                            








To request an appointment with one of our arrhythmia specialists, call: 650-723-6459.






















Nationally Recognized










Partnering for Excellence

The Stanford Cardiovascular Institute brings together Stanford doctors and scientists to advance the treatment of cardiovascular disease.












Arrhythmia Treatment




At Stanford Cardiac Arrhythmia Service, our goal is to move research discoveries into new diagnostic and treatment options and to bring these leading therapies to you..
Our highly skilled doctors participate in research and clinical trials to advance treatment for all types of arrhythmias. They are national leaders in developing new guidelines for treatments and have published textbooks and papers that educate other care providers.
 




INNOVATION HIGHLIGHTS









Stanford is one of the first U.S. hospitals to offer FIRM ablation, a new technology for mapping and treating atrial fibrillation that precisely identifies key sites for ablation. This novel treatment was invented by a Stanford doctor.
The Cardiac Arrhythmia service medical director is a co-inventor of cryoballoon ablation, a cardiac catheterization procedure that uses extreme cold to treat the heart tissue that triggers arrhythmia. Cryoablation has been used to treat more than 250,000 patients with atrial fibrillation worldwide.
Our team is among the first in the nation to develop hybrid surgical-catheter ablation, combining minimally invasive surgery with a catheter-based procedure to treat complex atrial fibrillation.

Learn more about our research and innovations »













2:06 








AFib Survivor: Frank's Story
                            


Play Video | 2:06
















AFib Survivor: Frank's Story




AFib Survivor: Frank Slootman's Story












3:57 








Breakthrough Afib Care Offered at Stanford Health Care
                            


Play Video | 3:57
















Breakthrough Afib Care Offered at Stanford Health Care




Breakthrough Afib Care Offered at Stanford Health Care




















Treatments by Condition







We offer seamless care for all arrhythmias, no matter how complex or rare, including specialized care for athletes and people with inherited conditions. Learn more about our treatments for these conditions:








Supraventricular arrhythmias

Atrial fibrillation (AFib)
Atrial flutter
Atrial tachycardia
Atrioventricular nodal reentrant tachycardia (AVNRT)
Atrioventricular reentrant tachycardia
Paroxysmal supraventricular tachycardia (PSVT)
Supraventricular tachycardia (SVT)
Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome

Ventricular arrhythmias

Ventricular fibrillation (VFib)
Ventricular tachycardia (VT)
Torsades de pointes
Premature ventricular beats (PVCs)

Inherited arrhythmias

Brugada syndrome
Catecholaminergic polymorphic ventricular tachycardia (CPVT) 
Long QT syndrome








Bradycardias

Heart block
Sick sinus syndrome

Cardiomyopathy

Amyloid cardiomyopathy
Arrhythmogenic right ventricular dysplasia/cardiomyopathy (ARVD/C)
Familial dilated cardiomyopathy
Heart failure

Heart valve disease
Hypertrophic cardiomyopathy
Ischemic cardiomyopathy
Marfan syndrome
Nonischemic cardiomyopathy
Sarcoidosis

Cardiac arrest


















All Treatments







Our arrhythmia team is internationally known as thought leaders in all aspects of arrhythmia treatment. Our specialized expertise includes:








Catheter ablation 
This therapy helps regulate heart rate and rhythm by disrupting abnormal electrical pathways through the heart. We offer these types of ablation:

Ablation by energy sources
Cryoablation
Radiofrequency ablation


Ablation with mapping technology: FIRM ablation 
Epicardial ablation

Surgery for arrhythmia
Depending on the type of arrhythmia you have, open-heart surgery may be your best option. Our expert surgeons perform these surgical procedures for arrhythmias:

Hybrid surgical-catheter ablation
Atrial fibrillation surgery (MAZE)

Genetic counseling
Our genetic counselors in the Center for Inherited Cardiovascular Disease can assess your risk for an inherited arrhythmia and work closely with you to develop a care plan for you and your family.







Medical management for arrhythmia
If you have an arrhythmia but your symptoms are not severe, we may be able to treat you with medications. Depending on your symptoms and other health factors, you may need medications to control your heart rate, your heart rhythm, or both, such as:

Anti-arrhythmic agents 
Medications for rate control

Devices that treat arrhythmia
For serious arrhythmias, you may need a device to control your heart rate and rhythm. We implant these devices in your chest using minimally invasive procedures:

Implantable cardioverter-defibrillator (ICD) 
Pacemaker 
Cardiac resynchronization therapy (CRT) 
Lead and device extraction 



















Clinical Trials














0
Open Clinical Trials
View All »









Our arrhythmia team is instrumental in national clinical trials that study the latest developments in arrhythmia diagnosis and treatment. Our research interests include pacemakers that can slow the progression of heart failure and ablation procedures for advanced atrial fibrillation. Learn more about clinical trials for arrhythmia.
Open trials refer to studies currently recruiting participants or that may recruit participants in the near future. Closed trials are not currently enrolling, but similar studies may open in the future.
To learn more about the clinical trials we offer, contact Gerri O'Riordan at 650-725-5597.













View Closed Clinical Trials for Cardiac Arrhythmia Service »
















Your Arrhythmia Care Team
Our arrhythmia team brings together expertise from several heart specialties to diagnose and treat electrical activities of the heart that cause arrhythmia. Our close collaboration with cardiologists and cardiac surgeons means that you receive comprehensive care for any heart condition.









Your Doctors







Cardiac Electrophysiologist
 Cardiac electrophysiologists specialize in diagnosing and treating disturbances of the heart’s electrical system. They evaluate arrhythmias (abnormal heart rhythms) to help determine the right treatment for you. They will be the first doctor you see, and they will oversee all aspects of your care, from diagnosis to treatment to follow-up care.
View All {0} Cardiac Electrophysiologists »





Cardiothoracic Surgeon
 Cardiothoracic surgeons with expertise in treating arrhythmias work closely with our team of cardiac electrophysiologists to help devise the best care path for you. The two specialists also partner on newer, minimally invasive techniques, including lead extractions and hybrid surgical-catheter ablation.
View All {0} Cardiothoracic Surgeons »















Extended Care Team













                Advanced Practice Providers
            



Many members of your team have undergone additional training and education to deliver some of the same care as doctors. They work closely with your surgeon or electrophysiologist.







ADVANCED PRACTICE PROVIDERS












                                                Lori Henry, NP
                                            

                                                Nurse Practitioner
                                            








                                                Lori Henry, NP
                                            

                                                Nurse Practitioner
                                            














                                                Crystaljade Lau, RN, MS, CNS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            








                                                Crystaljade Lau, RN, MS, CNS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            














                                                Aimee Lee, CNS, ACNP-BC
                                            

                                                Nurse Practitioner
                                            








                                                Aimee Lee, CNS, ACNP-BC
                                            

                                                Nurse Practitioner
                                            














                                                May Marquez, CNS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            








                                                May Marquez, CNS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            














                                                Kim Nguyen, CNS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            








                                                Kim Nguyen, CNS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            














                                                Linda K. Ottoboni, RN, CNS, CCDS, FHRS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            








                                                Linda K. Ottoboni, RN, CNS, CCDS, FHRS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            














                                                Kara Rainusso, MS, RN, ACNP-BC
                                            










                                                Kara Rainusso, MS, RN, ACNP-BC
                                            
















                                                Christine Tacklind, MS, CNS, ACNP-BC, CCRN
                                            

                                                Nurse Practitioner
                                            








                                                Christine Tacklind, MS, CNS, ACNP-BC, CCRN
                                            

                                                Nurse Practitioner
                                            














                                                Angela Tsiperfal, CNS, ACNP-BC, CCDS, FHRS
                                            

                                                Nurse Practitioner
                                            








                                                Angela Tsiperfal, CNS, ACNP-BC, CCDS, FHRS
                                            

                                                Nurse Practitioner
                                            














                                                Mustafa Yahya, RN, MS, CNS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            








                                                Mustafa Yahya, RN, MS, CNS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            
























                Nurses
            



Nursing professionals manage all your care, including appointment coordination, sharing your test results, and providing treatment. They also provide support and education so you and your family fully understand your care plan.








NURSES












                                                Marcia Glassford, RN
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Coordinator
                                            








                                                Marcia Glassford, RN
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Coordinator
                                            














                                                Alisson Aguilar, PCC
                                            

                                                Practice Coordinator
                                            








                                                Alisson Aguilar, PCC
                                            

                                                Practice Coordinator
                                            














                                                Kaylyn Armstrong, RN
                                            

                                                Device Nurse
                                            








                                                Kaylyn Armstrong, RN
                                            

                                                Device Nurse
                                            














                                                Colleen Bonnett, RN
                                            

                                                Nurse Coordinator
                                            








                                                Colleen Bonnett, RN
                                            

                                                Nurse Coordinator
                                            














                                                Josephine Collins, RN
                                            

                                                Nurse Coordinator
                                            








                                                Josephine Collins, RN
                                            

                                                Nurse Coordinator
                                            














                                                Saira Gonzalez
                                            

                                                Procedure Coordinator
                                            








                                                Saira Gonzalez
                                            

                                                Procedure Coordinator
                                            














                                                Stephanie Lazaro, PCC
                                            

                                                Practice Coordinator
                                            








                                                Stephanie Lazaro, PCC
                                            

                                                Practice Coordinator
                                            














                                                Carlene Mallet, RN
                                            

                                                Device Nurse
                                            








                                                Carlene Mallet, RN
                                            

                                                Device Nurse
                                            














                                                Geraldine O'Riordan, RN
                                            

                                                Research Coordinator
                                            








                                                Geraldine O'Riordan, RN
                                            

                                                Research Coordinator
                                            














                                                Madonna Paulin
                                            

                                                Practice Coordinator
                                            








                                                Madonna Paulin
                                            

                                                Practice Coordinator
                                            














                                                Allysonne Smith, RN
                                            

                                                Nurse Coordinator
                                            








                                                Allysonne Smith, RN
                                            

                                                Nurse Coordinator
                                            














                                                Yi (Eve) Zheng, RN
                                            

                                                Nurse Coordinator
                                            








                                                Yi (Eve) Zheng, RN
                                            

                                                Nurse Coordinator
                                            


















Afib Prevention Program
The Afib Prevention Program evaluates patients for common risk factors, such as obesity, sleep apnea, hypertension, and diabetes, and works to identify approaches to treat each person's atrial fibrillation.
Device Clinic
If you need a pacemaker or another implantable device, our device coordinators will help you navigate the process before, during, and after the procedure. They provide education about your device, the implantation procedure, and ongoing home care.
Genetic Counselors
If you are concerned about your risk for an inherited arrhythmia, genetic counselors in the Stanford Center for Inherited Cardiovascular Disease can guide you through decision-making about genetic testing, family planning, and medical management. They also provide support and counseling to help you cope with having or being at risk for an inherited heart condition. 
Psychologists
Our psychologists are behavioral medicine experts who specialize in cardiovascular medicine. They provide behavioral therapy and other services to help people living with a chronic heart condition or a heart device, such as a pacemaker or ICD.
Research Coordinators
Research nurse coordinators screen candidates who are eligible and willing to participate in our clinical research studies. They educate you about the process you will experience during the study and answer your questions.














Support Services







At Stanford, we take care of the details so that you can focus on your health and wellness. Our electrophysiologists, cardiologists, and surgeons work as a team with device nurses, advanced practice providers, dieticians and imaging technologists to coordinate every aspect of your care. We also offer a wide range of support services to promote healing and improve your quality of life.









Case Management
Financial Counseling
Guest Services
Integrative Medicine (acupuncture, massage)
Interpreter Services
Lifestyle Modification Support









Atrial Fibrillation Risk Factor Modification Program
Nutrition Services

Psychologists with expertise in chronic heart conditions
Spiritual Care
Stanford Health Library



















Accessing Care


Our electrophysiologists, cardiologists, surgeons, and their teams provides their services in our center on Stanford’s main campus. You can access all of your care—from diagnostic evaluation to treatment to follow-up care—in one place.











Comprehensive Care in One Convenient Location

Parking and directions: Please click on the location nearest you in the map.
Insurance: Seeing a Stanford doctor is easy. We accept self-referrals and most insurance plans.




Comprehensive Care in One Convenient Location

Parking and directions: Please click on the location nearest you in the map.
Insurance: Seeing a Stanford doctor is easy. We accept self-referrals and most insurance plans.




View All






 





Clinic Overview
Cardiac Arrhythmia Service, led by our electrophysiologists, provides leading tests and treatments to help treat people with atrial fibrillation and other arrhythmias. Learn more about the care environment and the tools and technologies offered at the Cardiac Arrhythmia Service.













Arrhythmia Experts
Our doctors bring together expertise from several heart specialties to diagnose and treat all arrhythmias















FIRM Ablation
We developed breakthrough mapping technology to precisely target the electrical sources of AFib















Device Expertise
Our specialized team helps program implantable heart devices, check functionality, and record results















Support Services
Support services at every stage of care, including support from country's largest cardiac psychology program










Leading Diagnostics
We offer leading tests and tools for accurate heart disease diagnosis















Care Coordinator
Nurse coordinators help guide you through every step of your care journey













Frequently Asked Questions










 Considering Stanford











                What areas of clinical research and innovation are Stanford doctors currently pursuing?
            



The Stanford Cardiac Arrhythmia Service is not only dedicated to treating its patients with the finest treatment options available, but also to advancing those treatments. Clinical research studies may be sponsored by the National Institutes of Health, other governmental agencies, or industry.
We're actively developing new approaches to arrhythmia diagnosis and treatment, including:

New device development
New treatments and diagnostic techniques for Atrial Fibrillation
New technologies for catheter ablation
Integration of imaging in catheter ablation
New treatments for arrhythmias in cardiomyopathies (hypertrophic, ischemic, nonischemic)
New approaches to ICD and Pacemaker therapy
Signal processing and mathematical techniques for diagnosis of arrhythmias
New diagnostic approaches to patients with inherited arrhythmic disorders

We work with the Stanford Biodesign Program—an innovative collaboration between medicine and engineering—to develop new technologies in medicine.
Additional Research and Innovation Advancements

A Stanford doctor co-invented a new form of ablation treatment called cryoablation (freezing), which has been used in over 200,000 patients worldwide, including patients with atrial fibrillation and supraventricular tachycardia.

The Stanford Center for Arrhythmia Research has assembled more than 40 faculty who represent numerous disciplines and are collaborating to solve arrhythmia related problems.
Stanford doctors have conducted clinical studies leading to approval of the radiofrequency energy ablation system measuring contact force to improve ablation outcomes. Learn more about radiofrequency ablation »
Stanford doctors and surgeons were in the first FDA clinical trial to test hybrid surgical-catheter ablation, combining minimally invasive surgery with a catheter-based procedure to treat complex atrial fibrillation. 
















                What insurance plans does Stanford Health Care accept?
            



We participate in a wide range of insurance plans. View the list of insurance plans accepted by Stanford Health Care »




Have insurance or pre-authorization questions? The Patient Financial Clearance team is available Monday – Friday, 8 a.m. – 5 p.m., to answer your questions. Please call 650-724-4445 or 1-877-291-7335 (toll free).















                How do I find the right doctor for me?
            



When choosing a doctor, it’s important to consider the doctor’s clinical training, experience and expertise in a specialized area that matches your health care needs.
You can find the right Stanford doctor for you by using our doctor directory and filtering the results based on a medical category, specialty, or doctor’s last name. View a list of cardiac arrhythmia doctors »















                What support services are available for patients with arrhythmia?
            



We offer a number of support services for arrhythmia, including cardiovascular support groups, interpreter services, nutrition services, a Lifestyle Modification Program, integrative medicine, a health library, and a variety of classes and events. Learn more about our support services »















                Do I need a doctor referral to be seen at Cardiac Arrhythmia Service?
            



You can call Cardiac Arrhythmia Service directly to schedule an appointment with one of our doctors. Call 650-723-6459 to make an appointment.















                Is financial assistance available?
            



Yes, Stanford Health Care offers financial assistance for patients who are uninsured or underinsured. Meet with one of our financial counselors to find the best approach to paying for your health care. Financial counselors are available Monday through Friday from 7:00 a.m. – 6:00 p.m.  Learn more about financial assistance services »























 First Appointment










                What should I bring to my first appointment?
            



Managing treatment for arrhythmia is a highly personalized process. Our clinic receptionists will confirm the information you should bring with you prior to your first appointment. For your first appointment, please bring the following test results and information:

Electrocardiogram (ECG or EKG)
Holter Report or ECG Monitor
Echocardiogram (Ultrasound of the Heart)
Heart MRI
Heart CT
Your medical history
Report or results from a physical examination

You will also need to have the following information with you when you check in:

Insurance card
A form of payment for any co-pays or deductibles
One form of photo ID:
Valid state-issued driver’s license
Valid state-issued ID card
Valid passport
Valid U.S. Military ID card
Valid U.S. Permanent Resident Card


















                I need directions to the clinic. Where do I park?
            



The Cardiac Arrhythmia Service is located at the following address. Valet and self-parking options are available for a fee. For more information, please see Directions and Parking information for Cardiac Arrhythmia Service:








                    Cardiac Arrhythmia Service
            






Please plan to arrive 20-30 minutes prior to your appointment time due to construction near the main hospital campus. This will allow you plenty of time to park, locate your clinic and complete any additional paperwork.  















                How do I send my medical record to SHC?
            



Please print, fill out, and return the Medical Record Release Form to your new patient coordinator. The medical release form is an authorization form for external facilities to release medical records to Stanford Health Care.















                Can my family member or friend attend my appointment?
            



Always feel free to bring someone with you to your appointments. A family member or friend can help ask questions, remember the information your care team gives you, and provide support.















                What is the best way to get all my questions answered during my appointment? 
            



Write down your questions before your appointment and rank them in order of importance, beginning with the most important ones. If there isn’t enough time to have all your questions answered during your appointment, ask your doctor who you can speak with to get your other questions answered. 























 Current Patients










                How do I reach someone if I have questions about my care?
            


Current patients may reach one of our outstanding arrhythmia nurse specialists during clinic hours at 650-723-6459. For after-hours, reach the on-call arrhythmia doctor at 650-723-7111.














                How do I pay my bill?
            


You have multiple options when it comes to paying your bill.

Online:
You can pay your bill in MyHealth or the MyHealth mobile app, our secure health information tool for patients
You can also pay as a guest without creating a login.


By mail:  
Stanford Health Care Hospital Payment Processing P.O. Box 740715, Los Angeles, CA 90074-0715


By calling a Customer Service Representative at 1-800-549-3720, Monday – Friday, 8 a.m. – 5 p.m.

For more information about billing, visit our Billing page. 
Patient billing services at Stanford Health Care are provided by the billing office. To inquire about a bill that you received, please contact customer service: 
Stanford Hospital Billing
Monday – Friday, 8 a.m. – 5 p.m.
1-800-549-3720














                What support resources are available to me? 
            



We offer a number of support services for arrhythmia patients, including cardiovascular support groups, interpreter services, nutrition services, a Lifestyle Modification Program, integrative medicine, a health library, and a variety of classes and events. Learn more about our support services »















                How do I cancel or reschedule my appointment?
            


Please call our clinic receptionists at 650-723-6459. They are available Monday through Friday, 8:30 a.m. to 5 p.m. to help you reschedule or cancel your appointment. 














                How do I know if a Clinical Trial is right for me?
            



To determine if a clinical trial is right for you, talk to your doctor. He or she can refer you to a research coordinator for more information on studies that may be right for your specific condition.
You can also find the guidelines for who can participate in a particular clinical trial online. However, it is best to work with your doctor to decide the right care approach for your needs.
View list of open, arrhythmia clinical trials at Stanford »























 International Patients










                I live overseas. How do I access Stanford care?
            



Many of our programs are available to international patients.
Our International Medicine Services team can help you find the right doctor, estimate medical costs, book travel, and get you information about Stanford programs and services.



Please call +1 650-723-8561 or email IMS@stanfordheatlhcare.org to get started. 




















For Referring Physicians








HOW TO REFER
We can help your patients connect with the right doctors and services. When you refer your patients to Stanford Health Care, we will keep you informed of your patients’ progress.



Fax a referral form with supporting documentation to 650-320-9443.


PHYSICIAN HELP LINE
Phone: 1-866-742-4811


Fax: 650-320-9443
Monday – Friday, 8:30 a.m – 5 p.m.




Stanford Health Care provides comprehensive services to refer and track patients, as well as provides the latest information and news for physicians and office staff. For help with all referral needs and questions, visit Referring Physicians.



















 Learn More & Sign Up » 



Log in to prism




















































Cardiac Arrhythmia Service



,
            


650-723-6459

            Getting Here »
        















Home


Close


Doctors


Clinics & Locations


Conditions & Treatments


 Clinical Trials


Patients & Visitors


MyHealth Login










Healthcare Professionals






Referring Physicians






Nursing






Allied Healthcare






About Us






Careers






Newsroom






Make a Donation






Stanford Health Now















Close



















Micron Solutions, Inc. – Diversified Contract Manufacturing



































Skip to content




Micron Solutions, Inc.
Diversified Contract Manufacturing















Home


















About Micron Solutions, Inc.
Micron Solutions, Inc. through its wholly-owned subsidiary, Micron Products, Inc. is a diversified contract manufacturing organization that produces highly-engineered, innovative medical device components requiring precision machining and injection molding.  The Company also manufactures components, devices and equipment for military, law enforcement, automotive and consumer product applications.
The Company's machining operations produce quick-turn, high volume patient-specific and off-the-shelf orthopedic implants and instruments.  The Company’s machining operations also include laser marking, automated polishing, passivation and coating. The Company has thermoplastic injection molding capabilities as well, and provides a full array of design, engineering, production services and management.   In addition, the Company is a global market leader in the production and sale of silver/silver chloride coated and conductive resin sensors used as consumable component parts in the manufacture of integrated disposable electrophysiological sensors.
Effective March 24, 2017, the Company changed its name to Micron Solutions, Inc. (NYSE MKT:MICR). It was formerly known as Arrhythmia Research Technology, Inc. (NYSE MKT:HRT).
 
 
 













Copyright © 2017 Micron Solutions, Inc. — Mins theme by GoDaddy












10-K: ARRHYTHMIA RESEARCH TECHNOLOGY INC /DE/ - MarketWatch



























































Latest News










Dow

21,613
+100.26
+0.47%






Nasdaq

6,412
+1.37
+0.02%






S&P 500

2,477
+7.22
+0.29%









5:19 P.M. ET


Updated
      Why you should avoid Jared Kushner’s weirdly casual approach to meetings
                                





 
5:15 P.M. ET


                                  Health-Care Debate Moves Forward in Senate
                                





 
5:14 P.M. ET


Updated
      Here’s why oil just scored its biggest one-day rally of 2017
                                





 
5:06 P.M. ET


                                  USANA Health Sciences shares drop after company misses earnings, cuts outlook
                                





 
5:02 P.M. ET


                                  Wells Fargo raises dividend by 3% to 39 cents a share
                                





 
5:00 P.M. ET


                                  Why oil prices scored their biggest one-day rally of 2017
                                





 
4:59 P.M. ET


Updated
      3M Co's logs worst-ever price drop, caps Dow's McDonald's-Caterpillar fueled rally
                                





 
4:58 P.M. ET


Updated
      S&P 500, Nasdaq notch records, but historic collapse in 3M stock caps Dow's rally 
                                





 
4:55 P.M. ET


                                  iRobot raises forecast after boost from Amazon Prime Day, stock skyrockets to record levels
                                





 
4:52 P.M. ET


Updated
      Long-dated Treasury yields jump most in 4 months as stocks, commodities rally
                                





 
4:49 P.M. ET


                                  SEC concludes initial coin offerings are securities
                                





 
4:46 P.M. ET


                                  Blue Apron co-founder Wadiak to step down from COO role
                                





 
4:46 P.M. ET


                                  Oil tops $48 as sources say API data show big drop in U.S. crude supply
                                





 
4:36 P.M. ET


                                  Sept. WTI oil trades at $48.40/bbl, up from $47.89 Nymex settlement
                                





 
4:36 P.M. ET


                                  WTI oil tops $48/bbl as sources say API data show hefty weekly drop in U.S. crude supplies
                                





 
4:36 P.M. ET


                                  iRobot shoots more than 25% higher on earnings beat, forecast raise
                                





 
4:36 P.M. ET


                                  U.S. Steel shares rally after earnings, outlook beat Street view
                                





 
4:33 P.M. ET


                                  Stocks are ignoring U.S. political uncertainty, but the dollar isn’t
                                





 
4:27 P.M. ET


                                  Amgen shares down 3% after company's guidance on lower end of expectations
                                





 
4:27 P.M. ET


Breaking
      AMD jumps after beating on earnings, raising forecast
                                





 








































Log In















    New York Markets After Hours
  


Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers














Home






Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




Get email alerts



         10-K: ARRHYTHMIA RESEARCH TECHNOLOGY INC /DE/
    








    By

Published: Mar 10, 2016 4:43 p.m. ET

Share


















































 



 















(EDGAR Online via COMTEX) -- Item 7. MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS  The following discussions of the Company's results of operations and financial condition should be read in conjunction with the consolidated financial statements and notes pertaining to them that appear elsewhere in this Form 10-K. Any forward-looking statements made herein are based on current expectations of the Company that involve a number of risks and uncertainties and should not be considered as guarantees of future performance. These statements are made under the Safe Harbor Provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward looking statements may be identified by the use of words such as "expect," "anticipate," "believe," "intend," "plans," "predict," or "will". Although the Company believes that expectations are based on reasonable assumptions, management can give no assurance that the expectations will materialize. Many factors could cause actual results to differ materially from our forward looking statements. These factors include those contained in more detail in Item 1A,"Risk Factors". The Company is under no obligation and does not intend to update, revise or otherwise publicly release any revisions to these forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date hereof or to reflect the occurrence of any unanticipated events.  Results of Operations  The following table sets forth, for the periods indicated, the percentages of the net sales represented by certain items reflected in the Company's statements of operations.   Years Ended December 31, 2015 % 2014 % Net sales 100.0 100.0 Cost of sales 85.3 80.7 Gross profit 14.7 19.3 Selling and marketing 5.1 4.2 General and administrative 11.0 9.7 Research and development 1.1 1.7 Other expense (1.3) (1.0) Income (loss) from continuing operations before income taxes (3.8) 2.7 Income tax provision - - Income (loss) from continuing operations (3.8) 2.7 Income from discontinued operations 1.7 - Net (loss) income (2.1) % 2.7 %  Net Sales  The Company's consolidated net sales for 2015 were $21,495,184, a decrease of $2,575,108, or 10.7%, from net sales of $24,070,292 in 2014. The decrease in net sales was due to a 20% decrease in net sales of sensors as well as an 11.7% decrease in net sales of orthopedic implant components, partially offset by a 7.9% increase in net sales of custom thermoplastic injection molding.  The decrease in net sensor sales was due to decreased volume of 10.9% due in part to reduced order volume from one of the Company's largest customers in 2014. In addition, silver surcharge billed decreased 29.9% due to the decrease in volume as well as a 17.7% decrease in the weighted average price of silver for the full year 2015, as compared to 2014. Net sales of orthopedic implant components were down as a result of decreased orders from the Company's third largest customer.  The decreases are partially offset by the Company's growth in custom thermoplastic injection molding for the automotive industry as a result of an increase in sales volume from the Company's second largest customer when compared to full year 2014.  Gross Profit  Gross profit decreased by $1,475,213 during 2015, from $4,638,051 in 2014 to $3,162,838 in 2015. Gross profit as a percentage of net sales decreased 4.6 points, from 19.3% in 2014 to 14.7% in 2015. The decrease in gross profit was due primarily to declining sales as a result of decreased order volumes in sensors and orthopedic implant components, as well as declining silver prices and increased expenditures in the Company's quality functions.  Orthopedic implant components gross profit as a percentage of sales decreased 8.6 points, when compared to 2014. The decrease in gross profit from orthopedic implant components is a result of decreased orders from the Company's third largest  Table of Contents  customer and the related product mix in 2015. Gross profit was also impacted by increased labor costs as a result of production issues in the first quarter of 2015.  While net sales of sensors decreased due to lower volumes and a decrease in the weighted average price of silver, gross profit as a percentage of net sales increased by 0.7 points for the year ended December 31, 2015, as compared to the prior year, due primarily to cost efficiencies and negotiated price reductions in raw materials.  Gross profit as a percentage of net sales in the Company's custom thermoplastic injection molding also experienced modest margin improvement due primarily to investments in automation for some of the Company's customers in the automotive industry. These margin improvements were partially offset by lower margins in tooling, net of deferrals, and other costs of sales.  Other cost of sales for the years ended December 31, 2015 and 2014 reflects support functions such as quality, engineering, tooling maintenance and material handling. Net other cost of sales as a percentage of net sales expanded to 10.2% in 2015 as compared to 7.6% in 2014. The increase is primarily due to increased expenditures of $367,664 in the Company's manufacturing quality function to support the Company's process and capital equipment validations as part of the long term growth strategy in our component manufacturing of machined and plastic parts.  For the year ended December 31, 2014, gross profit included $250,000 from net sales of Predictor licenses. There were no Predictor sales in 2015.  Selling and Marketing  The Company's consolidated selling and marketing expenses increased to $1,086,586, or 5.1% of net sales, in 2015 from $1,015,279, or 4.2% of net sales, in 2014; an increase of $71,307 or 7.0%. In 2015, wages, tax and benefits increased in the fourth quarter by $48,770 due to the addition of two salespeople. In addition, consulting and professional fees increased by $90,863 due largely to recruiting fees. The increases were partially offset by sales commissions decreasing by $86,627 due primarily to the decrease in sales of orthopedic implant components and sensors.  General and Administrative Expenses  The Company's consolidated general and administrative expenses increased to $2,355,484, or 11.0% of net sales, in 2015 compared to $2,322,795, or 9.7% of net sales, in 2014; an increase of $32,689 or 1.4%.  The increase in consolidated general and administrative expenses is due in part to $118,318 of impairment charges in the year ended December 31, 2015 related to patents pending that were no longer patentable, as compared with $63,086 for 2014, an increase of $55,232. The Company also incurred $45,000 of costs related to the analysis of merger and acquisition opportunities as well as increased consulting fees of $26,826 due largely to professional services related to strategic planning. Insurance expense increased $70,584 due primarily to $36,250 of premiums related to a new Accounts Receivable insurance policy, $8,000 related to 2014 policy audits and increases for general property, product liability and other coverages. Legal fees increased $41,438 in part due to fees associated with the Amendment to the Certificate of Incorporation for preferred stock, renewing the credit facility and other matters. Directors' compensation increased $33,750 due to the addition of two directors, one in April 2015 and one in July 2015. Travel expenses increased $20,815 due in part to travel related to consulting services for strategic planning as well as for recruiting efforts for new directors.  These increases were largely offset by decreased wages, taxes and benefits of $111,029 due in part to the departure of the Vice President of Human Resources in 2014. Additionally, the Company recorded $123,473 less in bonus expense and $8,641 less in investor relation fees.  Research and Development  The Company's consolidated research and development expenses decreased to $241,100, or 1.1% of net sales, in 2015 from $408,867, or 1.7% of net sales, in 2014; a decrease of $167,767, or 41.0%. The net decrease is due to a reduction in wages, taxes and benefits of $73,378 due primarily to turnover of two employees and a decrease of $91,836 for internal research and development costs for the development of new products and capabilities related to medical device components.  Other Income (Expense)  Other expense, net, was $270,512 in 2015 compared to $227,954 in 2014, an increase of $42,558. Interest expense was $260,300 in 2015 compared to $274,138 in 2014, a decrease of $13,838. In 2015, the Company incurred $30,463 in expenses related to the assets held for sale at December 31, 2015, partially offset by a net gain on fixed asset sales of $17,143. Additionally, in 2014, the Company recorded other income of $23,423 as a result of a refund of the remaining portion of the performance guarantee obligation of ART on behalf of RMDDx.  Table of Contents  Income Tax Provision  The tax provisions for the years ended December 31, 2015 and 2014 are attributable to the U.S. federal and state income taxes on our continuing operations. The Company's combined federal and state effective income tax rate from continuing operations was 0.1% and 0.3% in 2015 and 2014, respectively, due to the impact of deferred tax assets reserved for with a valuation allowance.  Income (Loss) from Discontinued Operations  On May 8, 2014, RMDDxUSA filed a voluntary petition for relief under Chapter 7 (Liquidation) of the United States Bankruptcy Code in the District of Massachusetts. A trustee was assigned to review the assets and liabilities of the company. At December 31, 2014, there were no assets and $320,056 of liabilities remaining on the balance sheet.  On March 20, 2015, the Chapter 7 discharge order was issued by the assigned trustee and the case was closed. For 2015, net income of $362,610 was recorded from discontinued operations as a result of the write off of the remaining liabilities of $320,056 and the reversal of other comprehensive income of $42,502 from cumulative translation adjustments from RMDDx Corporation. Net loss from discontinued operations for the year ended December 31, 2014 was $1,779 and consisted primarily of legal and other fees incurred offset by minor reversals.  Earnings Per Share  Consolidated basic and diluted loss per share for the year ended December 31, 2015 was $0.15 per share as compared to basic and diluted earnings of $0.24 and $0.23 per share, respectively for 2014, a decrease of $0.39 and $0.38, respectively. The decrease in earnings per share is due largely to the decrease in gross profit of orthopedic implant components and sensors, increased quality costs as well as the lack of net sales of Predictor licenses in the 2015 versus $250,000 in 2014. These decreases were partially offset by the impact of other income from discontinued operations as a result of the final discharge order in 2015 related to the bankruptcy of RMDDxUSA and reduced operating expenses.  Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements  In 2014, the Company entered into two operating leases for office equipment. Lease expense under all operating leases was approximately $7,288 and $4,812 for the years ended December 31, 2015 and 2014, respectively.  Liquidity and Capital Resources  Working capital was $2,509,588 as of December 31, 2015 as compared to $1,308,472 at year-end 2014, a net increase of $1,201,116. The increase is due primarily to the reclassification of $2,071,495 related to the revolver from current liabilities to long-term liabilities. In addition, the subordinated promissory notes of $473,135 were reclassified from long-term liabilities to current liabilities in 2015. When excluding the impact of the reclassification of the revolver and the subordinated promissory notes, working capital decreased $397,244. The remaining decrease in working capital was due largely to decreases in accounts receivable and inventory, partially offset by decreases in accounts payable and accrued expenses.  Net cash provided by operating activities of continuing operations was $1,469,766 in 2015, as compared to net cash provided by operating activities of continuing operations of $1,781,851 in 2014.  Cash on hand was $272,291 and $209,398 at December 31, 2015, and 2014, respectively. Substantially all of these funds are maintained in bank deposit accounts.  Inventories were $2,118,712 at December 31, 2015 as compared to $2,514,241 at December 31, 2014, a decrease of $395,529. The decrease in inventory was due to the timing of production requirements based upon customer orders.  Capital equipment expenditures were $1,182,541 in 2015 as compared to $1,514,678 in 2014. In 2015, capital expenditures for machinery and equipment for the manufacture of orthopedic implants totaled $738,731 as compared to $245,928 in 2014. Additionally, in 2015, machinery and equipment related to custom molding and sensors were $114,923 and $542,821, respectively. Lastly, in 2015 and 2014, tooling related to sensors were $195,102 and $208,215, respectively.  At December 31, 2015 the Company's total debt was $4,031,767 as compared to $4,338,043 at December 31, 2014, a decrease of $306,276 or 7.1%. The balance at December 31, 2015 was comprised of outstanding principal amounts of $1,710,287 of term debt, $1,511,495 on a revolving line of credit, $336,850 on an equipment line of credit and $473,135 of subordinated promissory notes as discussed in more detail below.  Table of Contents  The Company has a multi-year credit facility with a Massachusetts based bank. The credit facility includes a revolving line of credit (the "revolver"), commercial term loan, two equipment term loans and an equipment line of credit as detailed below. The debt is secured by substantially all assets of the Company with the exception of real property.  The revolver provides for borrowings up to 80% of eligible accounts receivable and 50% of eligible raw materials inventory. The interest rate on the revolver is calculated at the bank's prime rate plus 0.25% (3.75% at December 31, 2015). The revolver has a maturity date of June 2017. Amounts available to borrow under the revolver are $917,830 at December 31, 2015.  The commercial term loan has a five year term with a maturity date of March 2018. The interest rate on the loan is a fixed 4.25% per annum and the loan requires monthly payments of principal and interest of approximately $28,000.  In 2013, the Company had an equipment line of credit which allowed for advances of up to $1.0 million and included a one-year draw period during which payments were interest only. The draw period ended March 29, 2014 and the then outstanding balance on the equipment line of credit of $740,999 was converted to a five-year term loan with a maturity date of March 29, 2019 with monthly payments consisting of principal and interest at a fixed rate of 4.65%. The outstanding balance of the equipment term loan at December 31, 2015 was $501,281.  In 2014, the Company entered into an equipment line of credit that allowed for advances of up to $1.0 million under the multi-year credit facility and included a one-year draw period during which payments were interest only. The draw period ended June 26, 2015 and the then outstanding balance on the equipment line of credit of $415,785 was converted to an equipment term loan with a five-year term, maturing on of June 26, 2020. The equipment term loan requires monthly payments of approximately $8,000, consisting of principal and interest at a fixed rate of 4.67%. The outstanding balance of the equipment term loan at December 31, 2015 was $378,617.  On June 19, 2015, the Company entered into a new equipment line of credit for $1.0 million under the Company's multi-year credit facility. At December 31, 2015, $336,850 has been drawn on the new equipment line of credit. The term of this equipment line of credit is six years, maturing on June 19, 2021, inclusive of a maximum one-year draw period. Repayment shall consist of monthly interest only payments, equal to the bank's prime rate plus 0.25% as to each advance commencing on the date of the loan through the earlier of: (i) one year from the date of the loan or (ii) the date upon which the equipment line of credit is fully advanced (the "Conversion Date"). On the Conversion Date, principal and interest payments will be due and payable monthly in an amount sufficient to pay the loan in full based upon an amortization schedule commensurate with the remaining term of the loan.  The bank facility contains both financial and non-financial covenants. The financial covenants include maintaining certain debt coverage and leverage ratios. The non-financial covenants relate to various matters including receiving bank approval prior to executing further borrowings or security interests, mergers or consolidations, acquisitions, guarantees, sales of assets other than in the normal course of business, leasing, changes in ownership and payment of dividends. The Company was in compliance with all bank covenants as of December 31, 2015.  In January 2013, the Company entered into two equipment notes totaling $272,500 with a financing company to acquire production equipment. The notes bear interest at 4.66% and require monthly payments of principal and interest totaling approximately $5,000 over the term of five years. The outstanding balance of these equipment notes at December 31, 2014 was $116,214.  In December 2013, the Company completed a private offering in which the Company sold an aggregate of $500,000 in subordinated promissory notes. The notes are unsecured and require quarterly interest-only payments at a rate of 10% per annum. On the second anniversary following issuance, the interest rate increased to 12% per annum. The notes mature in December 2016 at which point the outstanding balance is due in full. The subordinated promissory notes may be prepaid by the Company at any time following the first anniversary thereof without penalty. The notes are subordinated to all indebtedness of the Company pursuant to its multi-year bank credit facility.  In connection with the subordinated promissory notes, the Company issued 100,000 warrants to purchase the Company's common stock. In 2014, the Company received proceeds of $105,300 from the exercise of 30,000 warrants. The warrants are exercisable through December 2016 at an exercise price of $3.51 per share. None of the warrants were exercised in 2015. A total of 70,000 warrants remain unexercised at December 31, 2015.  No dividends were declared or paid in 2015 or 2014.  The Company believes that cash flows from its operations, together with its existing working capital, the revolving line of credit and other resources, will be sufficient to fund operations at current levels and repay the next twelve months of debt obligations.  Table of Contents  Summary of Changes in Cash Position  As of December 31, 2015, the Company had cash on hand related to continuing operations of $272,291, an increase of $62,893 from December 31, 2014. Net cash provided by operating activities in 2015 totaled $1,469,766. Net cash used in investing activities in 2015 was $1,153,017. Net cash used in financing activities in 2015 totaled $253,856. All of the above were from continuing operations. The net cash flows for the year ended December 31, 2015 are discussed in further detail below.  Operating Cash Flows  Net cash provided by operating activities in 2015 was $1,469,766 due in part to a decrease in trade accounts receivable of $723,394, due in part to lower fourth quarter sales in 2015 as compared to 2014, as well as a decrease in inventory of $395,529, due to lower customer demand and a decrease in other non-current assets of $301,522. Cash provided by operating activities was also impacted by non-cash add-backs for depreciation and amortization of $1,464,588, impairment of intangibles of $118,318, share-based compensation of $29,178, non-cash interest expense of $27,683 and a $15,000 change in allowance for doubtful accounts.  These increases were partially offset by net cash used in operating activities in accounts payable of $303,768 due in part to lower inventory receipts as well as an increase in prepaid expenses and other assets of $94,547 due largely to increased prepaid insurance, as well as the impact of the net loss of $429,166.  In addition, there was a non-cash adjustment for net income from discontinued operations of $362,610.  Investing Cash Flows  Net cash used in investing activities in 2015 was $1,153,017. Net cash used in investing activities was primarily due to capital expenditures of $1,182,541, which relates primarily to the acquisition of machinery and equipment for the manufacture of orthopedic implant components of $738,731. In addition, in 2015, machinery and equipment related to custom molding and sensors were $114,923 and molds related to sensors were $195,102.  Financing Cash Flows  Net cash used in financing activities in 2015 was $253,856, due in part to net payments on the revolver of $560,000 as well as principal payments on long term debt of $526,594. These items were partially offset by proceeds from the equipment line of credit of $752,635 to finance purchases of machinery and equipment in 2015. Additionally, the Company received proceeds from the exercise of stock options of $80,103.  Inflation  The Company believes that inflation in the United States or international markets has not had a significant effect on its results of operations. However, there has been considerable volatility in both energy and commodity prices, particularly the cost of silver.  Environmental Matters  Like many industrial processes, the Company's manufacturing processes utilize hazardous and non-hazardous chemicals, the treatment and disposal of which are subject to federal and state regulation. Since its inception, the Company has expended significant funds to train its personnel, install waste treatment and recovery equipment and retain an independent environmental consulting firm to regularly review, monitor and upgrade its air and waste water treatment activities. The Company believes that the operations of its manufacturing facility are in compliance with currently applicable safety, health and environmental laws and regulations.  Based on the Company's analysis, the Company does not expect future costs in connection with environmental matters to have a material adverse effect on its financial condition, result of operations or liquidity aside from cost of regulatory compliance and maintaining certifications and processes related to compliance with environmental regulations.  Critical Accounting Policies  The preparation of financial statements and related disclosures in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America requires management to make judgments, assumptions and estimates that affect the amounts reported. Note 2 of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements describes the significant accounting policies used in the preparation of the consolidated financial statements. Some of these significant accounting policies are considered to be critical accounting policies, as defined below.  A critical accounting policy is defined as one that is both material to the presentation of the Company's financial statements and requires management to make difficult, subjective or complex judgments that could have a material effect on the Company's  Table of Contents  financial condition and results of operations. Specifically, critical accounting estimates have the following attributes: 1) the Company is required to make assumptions about matters that are highly uncertain at the time of the estimate; and 2) different estimates the Company could reasonably have used, or changes in the estimate that are reasonably likely to occur, would have a material effect on the Company's financial condition or results of operations. Estimates and assumptions about future events and their effects cannot be determined with certainty. The Company bases its estimates on historical experience and on various other assumptions believed to be applicable and reasonable under the circumstances. These estimates may change as new events occur, as additional information is obtained and as the Company's operating environment changes. These changes have historically been minor and have been included in the consolidated financial statements as soon as they became known. In addition, management is periodically faced with uncertainties, the outcomes of which are not within its control and will not be known for prolonged periods of time. These uncertainties are discussed in Item 1A, "Risk Factors" above. Based on a critical assessment of its accounting policies and the underlying judgments and uncertainties affecting the application of those policies, management believes that the Company's consolidated financial statements are fairly stated in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and present a meaningful presentation of the Company's financial condition and results of operations.  Management believes that the following are critical accounting policies:  Revenue Recognition  Product revenue is recorded when all criteria for revenue recognition have been satisfied, which is generally when goods are shipped to the Company's customers. Product revenue is recognized in the period when persuasive evidence of an arrangement with a customer exists, the products are shipped and title has transferred to the customer, the price is fixed or determined and collection is probable.  The Company enters into arrangements containing multiple elements which may include a combination of the sale of molds, tooling, engineering and validation services ("tooling") and production units. The Company has determined that certain tooling arrangements, and the related production units, represent one unit of accounting, based on an assessment of the respective standalone value. When the Company determines that an arrangement represents one unit of accounting, the revenue is deferred over the estimated product life-cycle, based upon historical knowledge of the customer, which is generally three years. The Company carries the sales and tooling costs, associated with the related arrangement, as deferred revenue and other current and non-current assets, respectively, on the Company's balance sheet. As the deferred revenue is amortized to sales, the associated prepaid tooling costs are amortized to cost of sales.  The Company cannot effectively predict short-term or long-term production volume in a consistent and meaningful manner due to the nature of these molds and associated products. Therefore, the Company is unable to account for the transactions under the Units of Production method and management has determined the most appropriate amortization method to be the Straight-Line method.  . . .  Mar 10, 2016  (c) 1995-2016 Cybernet Data Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved 


More from MarketWatch









More Coverage


One depressing reason millions of people are locked out of the American Dream


Why VIX is flirting with its lowest level in history, and how Wall Street is reacting


O.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family















Most Popular





The biggest dog in the Dow might soon break free





Here’s why Amazon, Facebook and the gang are not going to take down this market





S&P 500, Nasdaq finish at records as investors cheer earnings





One depressing reason millions of people are locked out of the American Dream





Trump Country Believes Trump Fights for Them




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found







































 






















MarketWatch.com Topics

























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets After Hours



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers


















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



Credit


Currency


Markets


Supermarkets


Textiles


Gas Prices




Airlines


Oil


Currencies


U.S. Stocks


Retail


Federal Reserve




U.S. Dollar


United Kingdom


Europe


European Markets


Energy Stocks


Copper






People in the news



Trump, Donald


Buffett, Warren


Hill, David


Rather, Dan


Brin, Sergey


King, David




Lewis, Michael


Perry, Rick


Berlusconi, Silvio


McCain, John


Musk, Elon


Carter, Jimmy




Obama, Barack


Clinton, Bill


Jackson, Michael


Bloomberg, Michael


Putin, Vladimir


Snow, John






Companies in the news



Miners


Connor


American International Group


Lilly (Eli) & Co.


Dow Chemical


DuPont




Apple Inc.


American Manufacturing


Ford Motor


General Motors


Jones


3M Co




Bank of America Corp.


Caterpillar Inc.


Dow Jones & Co.


Google Inc.


McDonald's Corp.


News Corp.






Organizations in the news



European Union


Consumers Union


General Assembly


Small Business Administration


European Central Bank


Nasdaq Stock Market




World Bank


World Trade Organization


Bank of England


Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Investment Company Institute


New York Stock Exchange




College Board


New York University


State University of New York


University of Massachusetts


University of Washington


Washington State University












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




5:23 PM EDT
July 25, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	After


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
5:20pWhy you should avoid Jared Kushner’s weirdly casual approach to meetings
5:15pHealth-Care Debate Moves Forward in Senate
5:15pHere’s why oil just scored its biggest one-day rally of 2017
5:06pUSANA Health Sciences shares drop after company misses earnings, cuts outlook
5:03pWells Fargo raises dividend by 3% to 39 cents a share
5:00pWhy oil prices scored their biggest one-day rally of 2017
5:00p3M Co's logs worst-ever price drop, caps Dow's McDonald's-Caterpillar fueled rally
4:59pS&P 500, Nasdaq notch records, but historic collapse in 3M stock caps Dow's rally 
4:55piRobot raises forecast after boost from Amazon Prime Day, stock skyrockets to record levels
4:53pLong-dated Treasury yields jump most in 4 months as stocks, commodities rally
4:50pSEC concludes initial coin offerings are securities
4:47pBlue Apron co-founder Wadiak to step down from COO role
4:47pOil tops $48 as sources say API data show big drop in U.S. crude supply
4:37pWTI oil tops $48/bbl as sources say API data show hefty weekly drop in U.S. crude supplies
4:37pSept. WTI oil trades at $48.40/bbl, up from $47.89 Nymex settlement
4:36piRobot shoots more than 25% higher on earnings beat, forecast raise
4:36pU.S. Steel shares rally after earnings, outlook beat Street view
4:33pStocks are ignoring U.S. political uncertainty, but the dollar isn’t
4:28pAmgen shares down 3% after company's guidance on lower end of expectations
4:27pBREAKINGAMD jumps after beating on earnings, raising forecast
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,613.43

+100.26
+0.47%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,412.17

+1.37
+0.02%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,477.13

+7.22
+0.29%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15






















































Plastics News : Login



























































Login
Register











The content you requested requires a paid subscription.




If you are already a paid subscriber, please login or subscribe on the left.

 


I already subscribe to Plastics News and have registered for access to PlasticsNews.com.
Please enter your email address and password below to log in.









Enter your email Address
 

Enter your password
 


 Remember my password
Forgot your password?





I already subscribe to Plastics News, but have not registered for access to PlasticsNews.com.
Please click on the activate button below to register your account on PlasticsNews.com.
Activate your subscription

For assistance, please contact us at:
Email: customerservice@plasticsnews.com
Phone: Within the U.S.:    +1-877-320-1723
Outside the U.S.:   +1-313-446-0450

 


Subscribe Now!
Gain full access to:
Plastics News


Current and Historical Resin Pricing
Exclusive Ranking and Lists
Unlimited access to 21 years of archived stories
Daily and Breaking News e-mail alerts


Subscribe Now
 
 





 














Insider trading history of Chambers Jason Russell    at Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc /de/ 



















Insider Monitor



Realtime

Insider Buys 

Insider buys today     
Insider buys 1 day ago
Insider buys 2 days ago
Insider buys 3 days ago
Insider buys 4 days ago
Insider buys 5 days ago
Insider buys 6 days ago
Insider buys 7 days ago
Insider buys 8 days ago
Insider buys 9 days ago
Insider buys 10 days ago



Insider Sales 

Insider sales today       
Insider sales 1 day ago
Insider sales 2 days ago
Insider sales 3 days ago
Insider sales 4 days ago
Insider sales 5 days ago
Insider sales 6 days ago
Insider sales 7 days ago



Top 10 

Top 10 insider buys of the week
Top 10 officer buys of the week
Top 10 insider buys of the month
Top 10 officer buys of the month
Top 10 insider sales of the week
Top 10 insider sales of the month









               
		







 Insider Stock Trading History of Chambers Jason Russell  








The following table details the trading activities 
(stock purchases, stock sales, and stock option exercises) 
reported to 
the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) 
by insider Chambers Jason Russell  since year 2005. 
The trader's CIK number is 1359359.
At the time of this reporting, Chambers Jason Russell  is the Director of Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc /de/ . 
(stock ticker symbol HRT).
See this page for all insider trading activities at Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc /de/ . 





Stock purchases, sales, and option exercises reported by insider Chambers Jason Russell  since 2005.
  

   Trade Date   
 Symbol 
 Company Name (Issuer) 
 Trade Type 
     Shares   
     Price ($)
   Value ($) 

 2015-12-28  HRT  Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc /de/   Option Ex  7,500  3.41  25,575 
 2015-06-03  HRT  Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc /de/   Sale  150  6.70  1,005 
 2015-06-04  HRT  Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc /de/   Sale  900  6.60  5,940 
 2015-06-05  HRT  Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc /de/   Sale  21  6.60  138 
 2015-06-10  HRT  Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc /de/   Sale  1  6.50  6 
 2015-06-11  HRT  Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc /de/   Sale  100  6.50  650 
 2014-08-14  HRT  Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc /de/   Sale  5,000  7.30  36,500 
 2008-09-15  HRT  Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc /de/   Buy  6,800  4.67  31,769 
 2008-09-11  HRT  Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc /de/   Buy  700  4.58  3,202 
 2008-09-12  HRT  Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc /de/   Buy  200  4.66  932 
 2007-08-21  HRT  Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc /de/   Buy  2,100  9.25  19,425 
 2007-08-16  HRT  Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc /de/   Buy  2,900  9.24  26,796 


Insider trading activities including stock purchases, stock sales, and option exercises
listed in the above table cannot be completely guaranteed as to their accuracy.
For more  information regarding the trades made by Chambers Jason Russell  
(Director of Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc /de/  at the time of this reporting) see 

the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC)  website.


















 



















Newest Insider Buys 
Insider Trading Resources 
Archive  
Privacy  
Contact  
2016,2017 Market Holidays 
Market Hours 






Tweet



 ©2017, insider-monitor.com. All rights reserved. 
 



















Contact Us – Micron Solutions, Inc.



































Skip to content




Micron Solutions, Inc.
Diversified Contract Manufacturing















Contact Us


















Investor RelationsPhone(978)602-1436Fax(978) 342-0168Address25 Sawyer Passway Fitchburg, MA 01420 
 
 




Micron Solutions, Inc. 
 
 













Copyright © 2017 Micron Solutions, Inc. — Mins theme by GoDaddy














Arrhythmia Research Technology, Inc. Announces New President and Chief Executive OfficerHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets closedS&P 5002,477.13+7.22 (+0.29%)Dow 3021,613.43+100.26 (+0.47%)Nasdaq6,412.17+1.37 (+0.02%)Arrhythmia Research Technology, Inc. Announces New President and Chief Executive OfficerMarketwiredApril 9, 2013ReblogShareTweetShareFITCHBURG, MA--(Marketwired - Apr 9, 2013) - Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc. ("Company") (  NYSE MKT :  HRT ) announces today that it has appointed Salvatore Emma, Jr. to serve as its President and Chief Executive Officer. Mr. Emma was also appointed to the Board of Directors. "We are very happy that he accepted the position," said E.P. Marinos, Chairman of the Board, Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc. "His experience and long relationships with our customers, products, and capabilities will solidify the organization ending the recent transition period.""Accepting the position of President and Chief Executive Officer at this pivotal time is a great privilege," said Mr. Emma. "With the combination of the Company's talented people, broad manufacturing capabilities, quality products, and strong culture of innovation, the Company is well positioned for growth. I am looking forward to working with the Board of Directors, customers and trading partners to add value for the shareholders."Mr. Emma joined Micron Products in 2007 as Director of Information Technology and was promoted to Vice President and General Manager in 2008. While at Micron, Mr. Emma has led initiatives in lean six sigma manufacturing and has helped to build a culture focused on customer satisfaction. Prior to joining Micron Products, Mr. Emma was an enterprise information systems consultant from 1995 to March 2007. His consulting engagements during this time included: Munters Corporation, a manufacturer of climate control equipment, Lawrence Pumps, Inc., an industrial pump manufacturer, Convergent Energy, Inc., a manufacturer of lasers and Micron Products, Inc. In this role, he led a variety of strategic initiatives including ERP implementation, business intelligence, information systems design, programming and business systems architecture. Previously, he served as Corporate Controller at Kervick Enterprises, Inc., an aerospace and orthopedics investment casting and forging manufacturing company. Mr. Emma holds a Bachelor of Science in Business Administration from Fitchburg State University.About Arrhythmia Research Technology, Inc. The Company through its wholly-owned subsidiary, Micron Products, Inc. has diversified manufacturing capabilities with the capacity to participate in full product life cycle activities from early stage development and engineering from prototyping to full scale manufacturing as well as packaging and product fulfillment services. Its subsidiary, Micron Products, Inc., also manufactures silver plated and non-silver plated conductive resin sensors and distributes metal snaps used in the manufacture of disposable ECG, EEG, EMS and TENS electrodes. The Company also has developed and distributes a customizable proprietary signal-averaging electrocardiography (SAECG) software used in the detection of potentially lethal heart arrhythmias and that is reconfigurable for a variety of hardware platforms.For more information please check our websites: http://www.arthrt.com  http://www.micronproducts.comForward-looking statements made herein are based on current expectations of the Company that involve a number of risks and uncertainties and should not be considered as guarantees of future performance. The factors that could cause actual results to differ materially include our ability to maintain our current pricing model and/or decrease our cost of sales; our ability to increase sales of higher margin products and services; variations in the mix of products sold; variability of customer demand and delivery requirements; ability to license our software, provide timely customization and updates; a stable interest rate market and/or a stable currency rate environment in the world, and specifically the countries where we are doing business; continued availability of supplies or materials used in manufacturing at competitive prices; continued availability of supplies or materials used in manufacturing at competitive prices; amount and timing of investments in capital equipment, sales and marketing, engineering and information technology resources; volatility in commodity and energy prices; and the Company's ability to offset higher costs with price increases. More information about factors that potentially could affect the Company's financial results is included in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011.ReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextU.S. venture capital's digital coin quandary: cash-rich startupsReutersA Penny-Crypto Miracle Making Some Americans RichAgora FinancialSponsoredWeyerhaeuser will spend millions to fix stinky wood in homesPuget Sound Business JournalGrab builds out war chest in a fight for car-share dominanceAssociated PressChina's army looks like it's getting ready for something big to go down in North KoreaBusiness InsiderWhat's the Problem with Joel Osteen?ChurchLeaders.comSponsoredDonald Trump thinks Jeff Bezos is his biggest threatYahoo FinanceA conspiracy theory about Chipotle is gaining steamBusiness InsiderNew report claims to reveal why the iPhone 8 is delayed, and it’s good newsBGR NewsStart Earning Miles With The Best Travel CardWise BreadSponsoredUChicago prof: Universial basic income should be a last resortYahoo Finance VideoS&P 500, Nasdaq poised to close at record highsYahoo FinanceBy a hair, Senate votes to debate GOP health care billAssociated PressDiscover it: 4.8 out of 5 avg. by 24K+ customersDiscover CardSponsoredHere's Trump's approval rating in every stateBusiness InsiderThe Navy's newest, most sophisticated aircraft carrier doesn't have urinalsBusiness InsiderRepublicans pull off narrow victory to move health reform forward33Ww: This is not about healthcare. The intent is to remove/reverse anything associated with Obama. If Obama had built a big beautiful wall with solar panels, they would be voting to tear it down. Hateful, vindictive people.Join the Conversation1 / 558














Arrhythmia Research Technology, Inc. | Company Spotlight Profile











Warning! This site has features that require JavaScript.












watch








        Arrhythmia Research Technology, Inc.
        
      

Sector: 


            Electromedical And Electrotherapeutic Apparatus
          
Region: 

MA, United States


 
  : 

|
NYSE MKT: HRT


  



Listed in: 
Healthcare & Pharmaceuticals


        Similar to:
Fresenius SE & Co. KGaA, 
        Varian Medical Systems, Inc.





♣ Request Investor Kit

 View Contact Details







 News & Analysis
















 Featured Company


Simpson Manufacturing Co., Inc.
Pleasanton, CA, US
Simpson Manufacturing Co., Inc., founded in 1956, is a growing international manufacturer and marketer of building products. Through its subsidiary,...







 You may also be interested in:





Varian Medical Systems, Inc.



Palo Alto, CA, US
Varian Medical Systems, Inc. designs and manufactures oncology systems. It manufactures medical devices and software for treating cancer and other...




Fresenius SE & Co. KGaA



Bad Homburg, HE, DE
Fresenius SE & Co. KGaA is engaged in the provision of healthcare related products and services. It operates through the...




IKF SpA



Peschiera del Garda, VR, IT
IKF SpA engages in majority and minority investments in small and medium-sized, listed and non-listed companies. It offers strategic financial...










×
Contact Investor Relations



Arrhythmia Research Technology, Inc.
Investor Relations
         25 Sawyer Passway
         Fitchburg , MA 01420
         United States
Phone:1.978.345.5000

SIC Code:
3845



Close




×
Request Investor Kit









Select your country:


Afghanistan
Aland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bonaire, St. Eust., Saba
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
Brit. Indian Ocean Terr.
British Virgin Islands
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo (Dem. Rep. of the)
Congo (Rep. of)
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Cuba
Curacao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern Terr.
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard & McDonald Islands
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Ivory Coast
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
La Reunion
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marianas
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
North Korea
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Romania
Russian Federation
Rwanda
Saint Barthelemy
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre & Miquelon
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Sint Marten
Slovakia
Slovenia
So Georgia & So Sand Isl
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
St Vincent & Grenadines
St. Lucia
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Timor-Leste
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
U.S. Minor Outlying Isl.
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands
Wallis & Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe





E-mail:


required field!



First Name:


required field!



Last Name:


required field!




Street 1:


required field!



Street 2:





City:


required field!



State/Province:


-
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming


required field!



Postal Code:


required field!






 I consent to receiving periodic email communications from Arrhythmia Research Technology, Inc.. 
            

 I'd like to receive more information from PrecisionIR.
            







Watch

Watch this company to be notified of upcoming earnings calls and new content with a weekly digest sent to your email.
            
 Watch content
            




Go!
Cancel






Company Spotlight is available free to investors through the financial support of participating companies. In return for receiving this free information, your contact data are made available to the companies whose reports you have ordered, and to other parties as described in our privacy policy, which you can read in its entirety here. In addition, you agree to be contacted by these companies from time to time. You may select at any time to opt out of these communications by using the unsubscribe link in your email(s) or by sending an email to nacustomerservice@precisionir.com.



×
 Enter your email address to watch this company.




E-mail (required):


required field!



First Name:





Last Name:












    Signup 




×
  Enter your email address and notification preferences.




A reminder has been added for this event.



    Add to Calendar
  


Add to Google Calendar


Add to Live Calendar


Add to Yahoo! Calendar


Add to iCalender


Add to Outlook Calendar







Or





Send me a reminder




Weeks

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
46
47
48
49
50
51
52



Days

0
1
2
3
4
5
6



Hours

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23



Minutes

0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9
10
11
12
13
14
15
16
17
18
19
20
21
22
23
24
25
26
27
28
29
30
31
32
33
34
35
36
37
38
39
40
41
42
43
44
45
46
47
48
49
50
51
52
53
54
55
56
57
58
59





before the event.

Please enter a valid email to watch!

First Name

Last Name








    Signup 








Arrhythmia Research Technology, Inc. Announces New President and Chief Executive OfficerHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets closedS&P 5002,477.13+7.22 (+0.29%)Dow 3021,613.43+100.26 (+0.47%)Nasdaq6,412.17+1.37 (+0.02%)Arrhythmia Research Technology, Inc. Announces New President and Chief Executive OfficerMarketwiredApril 9, 2013ReblogShareTweetShareFITCHBURG, MA--(Marketwired - Apr 9, 2013) - Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc. ("Company") (  NYSE MKT :  HRT ) announces today that it has appointed Salvatore Emma, Jr. to serve as its President and Chief Executive Officer. Mr. Emma was also appointed to the Board of Directors. "We are very happy that he accepted the position," said E.P. Marinos, Chairman of the Board, Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc. "His experience and long relationships with our customers, products, and capabilities will solidify the organization ending the recent transition period.""Accepting the position of President and Chief Executive Officer at this pivotal time is a great privilege," said Mr. Emma. "With the combination of the Company's talented people, broad manufacturing capabilities, quality products, and strong culture of innovation, the Company is well positioned for growth. I am looking forward to working with the Board of Directors, customers and trading partners to add value for the shareholders."Mr. Emma joined Micron Products in 2007 as Director of Information Technology and was promoted to Vice President and General Manager in 2008. While at Micron, Mr. Emma has led initiatives in lean six sigma manufacturing and has helped to build a culture focused on customer satisfaction. Prior to joining Micron Products, Mr. Emma was an enterprise information systems consultant from 1995 to March 2007. His consulting engagements during this time included: Munters Corporation, a manufacturer of climate control equipment, Lawrence Pumps, Inc., an industrial pump manufacturer, Convergent Energy, Inc., a manufacturer of lasers and Micron Products, Inc. In this role, he led a variety of strategic initiatives including ERP implementation, business intelligence, information systems design, programming and business systems architecture. Previously, he served as Corporate Controller at Kervick Enterprises, Inc., an aerospace and orthopedics investment casting and forging manufacturing company. Mr. Emma holds a Bachelor of Science in Business Administration from Fitchburg State University.About Arrhythmia Research Technology, Inc. The Company through its wholly-owned subsidiary, Micron Products, Inc. has diversified manufacturing capabilities with the capacity to participate in full product life cycle activities from early stage development and engineering from prototyping to full scale manufacturing as well as packaging and product fulfillment services. Its subsidiary, Micron Products, Inc., also manufactures silver plated and non-silver plated conductive resin sensors and distributes metal snaps used in the manufacture of disposable ECG, EEG, EMS and TENS electrodes. The Company also has developed and distributes a customizable proprietary signal-averaging electrocardiography (SAECG) software used in the detection of potentially lethal heart arrhythmias and that is reconfigurable for a variety of hardware platforms.For more information please check our websites: http://www.arthrt.com  http://www.micronproducts.comForward-looking statements made herein are based on current expectations of the Company that involve a number of risks and uncertainties and should not be considered as guarantees of future performance. The factors that could cause actual results to differ materially include our ability to maintain our current pricing model and/or decrease our cost of sales; our ability to increase sales of higher margin products and services; variations in the mix of products sold; variability of customer demand and delivery requirements; ability to license our software, provide timely customization and updates; a stable interest rate market and/or a stable currency rate environment in the world, and specifically the countries where we are doing business; continued availability of supplies or materials used in manufacturing at competitive prices; continued availability of supplies or materials used in manufacturing at competitive prices; amount and timing of investments in capital equipment, sales and marketing, engineering and information technology resources; volatility in commodity and energy prices; and the Company's ability to offset higher costs with price increases. More information about factors that potentially could affect the Company's financial results is included in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including its Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2011.ReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextU.S. venture capital's digital coin quandary: cash-rich startupsReutersA Penny-Crypto Miracle Making Some Americans RichAgora FinancialSponsoredWeyerhaeuser will spend millions to fix stinky wood in homesPuget Sound Business JournalGrab builds out war chest in a fight for car-share dominanceAssociated PressChina's army looks like it's getting ready for something big to go down in North KoreaBusiness InsiderWhat's the Problem with Joel Osteen?ChurchLeaders.comSponsoredDonald Trump thinks Jeff Bezos is his biggest threatYahoo FinanceA conspiracy theory about Chipotle is gaining steamBusiness InsiderNew report claims to reveal why the iPhone 8 is delayed, and it’s good newsBGR NewsStart Earning Miles With The Best Travel CardWise BreadSponsoredUChicago prof: Universial basic income should be a last resortYahoo Finance VideoS&P 500, Nasdaq poised to close at record highsYahoo FinanceBy a hair, Senate votes to debate GOP health care billAssociated PressDiscover it: 4.8 out of 5 avg. by 24K+ customersDiscover CardSponsoredHere's Trump's approval rating in every stateBusiness InsiderThe Navy's newest, most sophisticated aircraft carrier doesn't have urinalsBusiness InsiderRepublicans pull off narrow victory to move health reform forward33Ww: This is not about healthcare. The intent is to remove/reverse anything associated with Obama. If Obama had built a big beautiful wall with solar panels, they would be voting to tear it down. Hateful, vindictive people.Join the Conversation1 / 558








﻿







Rodd Friedman, Arrhythmia Research Technology, Inc. (NYSEMKT:HRT)’s insider Invested in 35,304 Shares – Octafinance























































 








Tuesday, 25 July 2017

























 

Menu



Featured News


						2 years ago - Alphabet Inc (NASDAQ:GOOGL) Tests Its Ad Technology On Billboards To Cushion Itself Against Ad Blocks


						2 years ago - China Margin Debt Hits 8-Week High, Japan Pumps’n’Dumps As Kyle Bass Fears Looming EM Banking Crisis


						2 years ago - Marc Faber Shares His Insight in One Hour Exclusive Interview. He Covers All From Commodities and China to Inflation, The Euro and Gold


						2 years ago - Carl Icahn Criticizes the Fed. Feels Bad For Investors Buying Junk Bonds


						2 years ago - John Burbank: European QE Can’t Save The Markets Same As the U.S. Quantitative Easing. Everything Will Be Liquidated










Rodd Friedman, Arrhythmia Research Technology, Inc. (NYSEMKT:HRT)’s insider Invested in 35,304 Shares


09/26/2015  by OctaStaff 
			in Insider News, Momentum Equities 












Share with your friendsYour NameYour EmailRecipient EmailEnter a MessageI read this article and found it very interesting, thought it might be interesting for you. The article is called Rodd Friedman, Arrhythmia Research Technology, Inc. (NYSEMKT:HRT)’s insider Invested in 35,304 Shares and is was published by Octafinance.com at http://www.octafinance.com/rodd-friedman-arrhythmia-research-technology-inc-nysemkthrts-insider-invested-in-35304-shares/208184/.CaptchaSubmit
Rodd Friedman Insider Buy Transaction
 After the publishing of a document filled with SEC; a new purchase became apparent. The major shareholder of Arrhythmia Research Technology, Inc. (NYSEMKT:HRT)  3.80 -0.07 -1.81%, Rodd Friedman; performed a trade in the open market by buying 35,304 shares at an avg. stock price per share of $6.7 of the Amex-listed company having a market value near $235,842 USD. Rodd Friedman has rights to about 21.48% of Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc’s market cap or 596,479 shares.
Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc Stock Rating, Sentiment and Fundamentals






Rating & SentimentPsychSignal Social:SELLAnalysts Rating:BUYHedge Funds Sentiment:-




Stock FundamentalsEarnings + FCF Trend:SELLSector/Industry Macro:BULLISHValuation Models:-


 


Technical AnalysisST Trend:DOWNMT Trend:DOWNLT Trend:DOWN




OctaFinance Rating*:NEUTRAL


* Read How Our Stock Ratings System Works








 The share price of Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc is decreasing with no signs of trend change after 15.37% move over the last 200 days. We rate the Massachusetts-based Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc’s stock – NEUTRAL, based on our trend model.
Price Chart of Arrhythmia Research Technology NYSEMKT:HRT Stock
 
Source: RightEdgeSystems, Yahoo Split & Dividend Adjusted Data and OctaFinance Interpretations
Arrhythmia Research Technology NYSEMKT:HRT Company Profile
Arrhythmia Research Technology, Inc. is a contract manufacturing organization (CMO). Through its wholly owned subsidiary, Micron Products, Inc., the Company produces medical device technologies requiring precision machining and injection molding. The Company also manufactures components, devices and equipment for military, law enforcement, industrial and consumer product applications. It is a manufacturer and distributor of silver-plated and non-silver plated conductive resin sensors for use in the manufacture of disposable electrodes for electrocardiogram (ECG) diagnostic, monitoring and related instrumentation. The Company is also a contract manufacturer of orthopedic implant components for full and partial knee replacements, including femorals, tibial trays and inserts with capabilities. Its plastic injection molding services are suited to consumable medical products and medical device components.
Company Website: Arrhythmia Research Technology
 As of writing its market value is: $17.33 million and it has 2.78 million outstanding shares. Now the company has 14.36% shareholders and the institutional ownership stands at 14.36%. The company has 98 employees. Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc was formed in Delaware on 1987-06-12. The stock closed at $6.22 yesterday and it had average 2 days volume of 235 shares. It is down from the 30 days average shares volume of 2734. Arrhythmia Research Technology Inc has a one year low of $5.50 and a one year high of $7.95. The stock price is below the 200 days Simple moving average.
Rodd Friedman is also 10 percent owner of Security Devices International Inc.
* Includes 12 transactions from May 7 through August 24 – 2015.
* Includes 12 transactions at per share prides from $5.98 to $6.60 – averaging $6.21.
* Includes 200 transactions from May 4 through August 28 – 2015.
* Includes 200 transactions at per share prices of from $5.97 to $6.90 – averaging $6.45.
* Includes 11 transactions from May 11 through August 31 – 2015.
* Includes 11 transactions at per share prices from $6.19 to $6.61 – averaging $6.27.
* Includes 6 transactions from May 14 through June 16
* Includes 6 transactions at per share prices from $6 – 34 to $6.40 – averaging $6.38.

Arrhythmia Research Technology - Receive News & Ratings Via Email - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 



 
Tagged: Arrhythmia Research Technology - (NYSEMKT:HRT)Rodd Friedman



Edward Lampert just Made a Purchase of 233,655 shares of Sears Holdings Corp (NASDAQ:SHLD), be careful if you are short! Insider Trading: Joseph Alala Paid for 7,420 Shares of Capitala Finance Corp (NASDAQ:CPTA) 



 





Arrhythmia Research Technology - Get News & Ratings Daily
    Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for Arrhythmia Research Technology with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 



Hedge Fund NewsTop 10 CITADEL ADVISORS 13F Holdings in Q3 2015DF DENT & CO INC Just Released Its Q3 2015 Stock PositionsMAVERICK CAPITAL Top 10 Holdings in Q3 2015Analyzing Ken Griffins CITADEL ADVISORS Stock Holdings in Q3 2015LONE PINE CAPITAL Top 10 13F Positions in Q3 2015Guru NewsFelix Zulauf Sees a Stock Market Correction Coming. This Rally S&P 500 (INDEXSP:.INX) Will Be Short-LivedMarc Faber Shares His Insight in One Hour Exclusive Interview. He Covers All From Commodities and China to Inflation, The Euro and GoldJim Grant: The Next Thing Might Be Helicopter Money. What to Buy and Where He Sees Investment OpportunitiesKyle Bass Bearish on Emerging Markets for at least 2 More Years. Looking to Short CurrenciesDavid Tepper Gets Defensive. Is it Time to Get Out of The Stock Market?


Macro NewsChina Margin Debt Hits 8-Week High, Japan Pumps’n’Dumps As Kyle Bass Fears Looming EM Banking CrisisAre US – Russian Relations A Zero-Sum Game?US and Russia have launched direct talks on the conflict in SyriaYuan Drops as PBOC Cuts Reference Rate by Most Since DevaluationCould the market crash like 1987?—put volume spike argues low is nearCTAs NewsRed Rock Just Published Report About The Trend Following Landscape & How CTAs’ Performance Must Be AnalyzedHow to Implement Dual Momentum for non-US InvestorsDo Commodity Trading Advisors (CTAs) Really Provide Crisis Alpha, Equity Hedge and Are Long Volatility?









































Arrhythmia Research Technology Jobs Hiring | Indeed.com




Skip to Job Postings, SearchClose






Find JobsCompany ReviewsFind SalariesFind ResumesEmployers / Post Job







Upload your resume


Sign in







:







What
Where





Advanced Job Search


 

 



 



job title, keywords or company







Tip: Enter your city or zip code in the "where" box to show results in your area.




















Arrhythmia Research Technology jobs


Filter results by:
Sort by: relevance -
            date



Salary Estimate




$45,000+ (73)

$55,000+ (58)

$60,000+ (52)

$65,000+ (35)

$75,000+ (17)






Job Type




Full-time (65)

Part-time (14)

Temporary (4)

Commission (3)






Location




Ann Arbor, MI (19)

Mesa, AZ (10)

Pittsburgh, PA (7)

Celebration, FL (4)

Sioux Falls, SD (2)

Walla Walla, WA (2)

Boston, MA (2)

Orlando, FL (2)

Seneca, PA (2)

New York State (2)

Casa Grande, AZ (2)

Farrell, PA (2)

Hartford, CT (2)

Lincolnshire, IL (2)

Daly City, CA (2)

more »




Company




UPMC (12)

Banner Health (12)

Michigan Medicine (9)

University of Michigan (9)

Sanford Health (4)

Providence Health & Services (2)

Mount Sinai Health System (2)

Boston Scientific Corporation (2)

Nemours Children's Health System (2)

Hartford Hospital (2)

Florida Hospital (2)

Adventist Health System (2)

iRhythm (2)

Johnson & Johnson Family of Companies (2)

Seton Medical Center (2)

more »




Experience Level




Entry Level (52)

Mid Level (21)

Senior Level (3)










Jobs 1 to 10 of 84

 Upload your resume - Let employers find you








Casual Professional Staff Nurse 3MT Medical Telemetry




    UPMC

 - 

486 reviews
 - Greenville, PA 16125


Basic arrhythmia training preferred. Utilizes research and evidence-based practice to support improvement in clinical care:....



Sponsored - save job








Cardiovascular Invasive Lab Technologist III – Cath Lab – Ce...




    Florida Hospital

 - 

861 reviews
 - Celebration, FL


Associate’s degree in Cardiovascular Technology, Nursing, Radiologic Technology or Respiratory Therapy. Knowledge of EKG training and arrhythmia interpretation....



Sponsored - save job








REGISTERED NURSE UH ( Medical Short Stay Unit )




    University of Michigan Health System

 - 

332 reviews
 - Ann Arbor, MI 48113


Patient care, education and research that together enhance our contribution to society. The University of Michigan Health System improves the health of patients...



Sponsored - 21 hours ago   -  save job









Scientific Researcher




    University of South Florida


 - 

335 reviews
 - Tampa, FL



$48,000 - $60,000 a year


This position requires a Master's degree in a natural science related to the specific area of research and two years of research experience....


30+ days ago   -  save job - more...

View all University of South Florida jobs in Tampa, FL - Tampa jobsSalary Search: Researcher salaries in Tampa, FLLearn more about working at University of South FloridaUniversity of South Florida questions about work, benefits, interviews and hiring process:How are the working hours?What is the best way to get an interview?Related forums: Tampa, Florida - University of South Florida










Cardiovascular Technologist II (EP)




    UPMC


 - 

486 reviews
 - Pittsburgh, PA 15237





Is knowledgeable in arrhythmia recognition,. Keep abreast of current cardiovascular technology through participation in research studies and biannual re...


7 days ago   -  save job - more...

View all UPMC jobs in Pittsburgh, PA - Pittsburgh jobsSalary Search: Senior Technologist salaries in Pittsburgh, PALearn more about working at UpmcUpmc questions about work, benefits, interviews and hiring process:Does UPMC pay for your lunch break or is that deducted out of pay ?Do you rehire employeesRelated forums: Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania - UPMC










Invasive Cardiovascular Technologist X-ray




    UnityPoint Health


 - 

118 reviews
 - Peoria, IL





Collaborate with Research RN/Coordinator in carrying out laboratory-based research. Advanced knowledge of EKG interpretation and arrhythmia recognition,...


30 days ago   -  save job - more...

View all UnityPoint Health jobs in Peoria, IL - Peoria jobsSalary Search: X-ray Technician salaries in Peoria, ILLearn more about working at Unitypoint HealthUnitypoint Health questions about work, benefits, interviews and hiring process:What benefits does the company provide?How many references do you need to get hired?Related forums: Peoria, Illinois - UnityPoint Health










Post-Doctoral Research Fellow in Cardiac Tissue Engineering




    Aurora Health Care


 - 

397 reviews
 - Milwaukee, WI 53233 (Marquette area)





Submits grant application(s) to obtain research funding and manuscript(s) for publication based on research project....


25 days ago   -  save job - more...

View all Aurora Health Care jobs in Milwaukee, WI - Milwaukee jobsSalary Search: Post-doctoral Fellow salaries in Milwaukee, WILearn more about working at Aurora Health CareAurora Health Care questions about work, benefits, interviews and hiring process:What is the most stressful part about working at Aurora HealthCare?How long does it take to get hired from start to finish? What are the st...Related forums: Milwaukee, Wisconsin - Aurora HealthCare










Cardiology Technician Non-Invasive




    University of Michigan


 - 

675 reviews
 - Ann Arbor, MI





Conduct arrhythmia analysis for patients assigned to remote telemetry. Patient care, education and research that together enhance our contribution to society....


6 days ago   -  save job - more...

View all University of Michigan jobs in Ann Arbor, MI - Ann Arbor jobsSalary Search: Echocardiologist salaries in Ann Arbor, MILearn more about working at University of MichiganUniversity of Michigan questions about work, benefits, interviews and hiring process:What is the interview process like?If you were to leave The University of Michigan, what would be the reason?Related forums: The University of Michigan - Ann Arbor, Michigan










Engineer, Applied Research



    Micro Systems Engineering, Inc. (MSEI)


 - Lake Oswego, OR





Engineer, Applied Research. Interface to external research partners. Generate proposals based on a research road-map....


30+ days ago   -  save job - more...

View all Micro Systems Engineering, Inc. (MSEI) jobs in Lake Oswego, OR - Lake Oswego jobsSalary Search: Researcher salaries in Lake Oswego, ORRelated forums: Lake Oswego, Oregon










BUSINESS UNIT MANAGER




    Johnson & Johnson Family of Companies


 - 

2,167 reviews
 - El Paso, TX





Coordinate implementation of new process, information management systems and product technologies. Our vision and mission are clear - be #1 in rhythm solutions...


11 days ago   -  save job - more...

View all Johnson & Johnson Family of Companies jobs in El Paso, TX - El Paso jobsSalary Search: Unit Manager salaries in El Paso, TXLearn more about working at Johnson & Johnson Family of CompaniesJohnson & Johnson Family of Companies questions about work, benefits, interviews and hiring process:How long does it take to get hired from start to finish? What are the st...Do interns get paid?Related forums: El Paso, Texas - Johnson & Johnson - Business Unit Manager










Cardiology Tech Non-Invasive




    University of Michigan


 - 

675 reviews
 - Ann Arbor, MI





Conduct arrhythmia analysis for patients assigned to remote telemetry. Patient care, education and research that together enhance our contribution to society....


4 days ago   -  save job - more...

View all University of Michigan jobs in Ann Arbor, MI - Ann Arbor jobsSalary Search: Technician salaries in Ann Arbor, MILearn more about working at University of MichiganUniversity of Michigan questions about work, benefits, interviews and hiring process:What is the interview process like?If you were to leave The University of Michigan, what would be the reason?Related forums: The University of Michigan - Ann Arbor, Michigan










Cardiology Technician Non-Invasive




    Michigan Medicine


 - 

4 reviews
 - Ann Arbor, MI





Conduct arrhythmia analysis for patients assigned to remote telemetry. Patient care, education and research that together enhance our contribution to society....


5 days ago   -  save job - more...

View all Michigan Medicine jobs in Ann Arbor, MI - Ann Arbor jobsSalary Search: Echocardiologist salaries in Ann Arbor, MILearn more about working at Michigan MedicineRelated forums: Ann Arbor, Michigan - Michigan Medicine










Cardiology Tech Non-Invasive




    Michigan Medicine


 - 

4 reviews
 - Ann Arbor, MI





Conduct arrhythmia analysis for patients assigned to remote telemetry. Patient care, education and research that together enhance our contribution to society....


3 days ago   -  save job - more...

View all Michigan Medicine jobs in Ann Arbor, MI - Ann Arbor jobsSalary Search: Technician salaries in Ann Arbor, MILearn more about working at Michigan MedicineRelated forums: Ann Arbor, Michigan - Michigan Medicine












REGISTERED NURSE (University Hospital, Surgical Short Stay U...




    University of Michigan Health System

 - 

332 reviews
 - Ann Arbor, MI 48113


Research and Quality Improvement:. Patients may have arrhythmias necessitating a proficiency in cardiac assessment and monitoring....



Sponsored - 21 hours ago   -  save job








Staff Nurse II




    Seton Medical Center

 - 

6 reviews
 - Daly City, CA


EKG interpretation & arrhythmia management experience required. Integrates/applies new knowledge from education and research into clinical practice....



Sponsored - save job








Never miss a job. Get new jobs emailed to you daily.






Be the first to see new Arrhythmia Research Technology jobs














My email: 




Also get an email with jobs recommended just for me



You can cancel email alerts at any time.






Results Page:  1  2  3  4  5   Next »


Related Forums:
Business Unit Manager



Salaries:
Business Unit Manager salary

 




Be the first to see new Arrhythmia Research Technology jobs














My email: 


Also get an email with jobs recommended just for me





You can cancel email alerts at any time.





Company with Arrhythmia Research Technology jobs








            Florida Hospital

Florida Hospital is the largest hospital system in Central Florida, the busiest hospital in the nation, with 10 distinct hospital locations.







Jobs (1,305)
Reviews (861) 

Photos (6)
Salaries (879)



Researcher salaries in United States$65,456 per yearBased on 11,659 salariesMin$14,000Max$174,000Researcher salaries by company in United States










Indeed helps people get jobs: Over 10 million stories sharedJobs - Browse Companies - Salaries - 









Job Category Trends - Forums - 
Browse Jobs - Tools - Work at Indeed - API - About - Help Center


©2017 Indeed - Cookies, Privacy and Terms






















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft



























Cardiac Arrhythmia Service | Stanford Health Care













































































Share on Facebook


Twitter


Google+


Email




Close


Open




Close


Open












Close


Open




Close


Open






Share on Facebook


Twitter


Google+


Email












Menu



Search






Menu



Search









Doctors


Clinics & Locations


Conditions & Treatments


Patients & Visitors



MyHealth Login




















Billing


Insurance


Medical Records


Support Groups









Locations and Parking


Visiting Hours


Your Hospital Stay


International Patients







View All Information for Patients & Visitors »





We are available to assist you 24/7.


650-498-3333



GuestServices@stanfordhealthcare.org
















New to MyHealth?
Manage Your Care From Anywhere.
Access your health information from any device with MyHealth.  You can message your clinic, view lab results, schedule an appointment, and pay your bill.



Activate Your Account
with an access code or Create a New Account





MyHealth for Mobile
The MyHealth mobile app puts all your health information at your fingertips and makes managing your health care simple and quick.  Available for iPhone and Android.









            WELCOME BACK
        








Forgot ID or Forgot Password?

Need Help?
























Clear
























Cardiac Arrhythmia Service
Part of Cardiovascular Health








           We are with you every step of the way
           Watch Video











           We are with you every step of the way
           Watch Video






Experts in Arrhythmia Treatment
At Stanford, our electrophysiologists have an international reputation for treating people with atrial fibrillation and other arrhythmias, and they have invented many of today’s leading procedures.
Our team specializes in ablation, surgical therapies, device management, and treatment of inherited conditions.






 

Find a Doctor








                    Make an Appointment
            







Maps & Directions













WHAT WE OFFER FOR ARRHYTHMIA CARE





Specialized expertise in treating supraventricular arrhythmias, inherited arrhythmias, bradycardia, cardiomyopathy, and more. Go to Conditions Treated
Advanced treatments for ablation and surgical therapies, including access to clinical trials. Go to Treatments
Team-based approach to care that brings together doctors from multiple specialties. Go to Your Care Team
Comprehensive support services including nutrition and genetic counseling. Go to Support Services
Easy access to care with a single location for all services. Go to Accessing Care








COMMON CONDITIONS TREATED




To learn more about our care for the following conditions, please visit: 

Atrial fibrillation (AFib) »
Atrial flutter »
Ventricular arrhythmias »
Brugada syndrome »
Long QT syndrome »
Bradycardias (slow heart rhythms) »
Cardiomyopathy »

To see all conditions, Go to Conditions Treated



















                            Make An Appointment
                            








To request an appointment with one of our arrhythmia specialists, call: 650-723-6459.






















Nationally Recognized










Partnering for Excellence

The Stanford Cardiovascular Institute brings together Stanford doctors and scientists to advance the treatment of cardiovascular disease.












Arrhythmia Treatment




At Stanford Cardiac Arrhythmia Service, our goal is to move research discoveries into new diagnostic and treatment options and to bring these leading therapies to you..
Our highly skilled doctors participate in research and clinical trials to advance treatment for all types of arrhythmias. They are national leaders in developing new guidelines for treatments and have published textbooks and papers that educate other care providers.
 




INNOVATION HIGHLIGHTS









Stanford is one of the first U.S. hospitals to offer FIRM ablation, a new technology for mapping and treating atrial fibrillation that precisely identifies key sites for ablation. This novel treatment was invented by a Stanford doctor.
The Cardiac Arrhythmia service medical director is a co-inventor of cryoballoon ablation, a cardiac catheterization procedure that uses extreme cold to treat the heart tissue that triggers arrhythmia. Cryoablation has been used to treat more than 250,000 patients with atrial fibrillation worldwide.
Our team is among the first in the nation to develop hybrid surgical-catheter ablation, combining minimally invasive surgery with a catheter-based procedure to treat complex atrial fibrillation.

Learn more about our research and innovations »













2:06 








AFib Survivor: Frank's Story
                            


Play Video | 2:06
















AFib Survivor: Frank's Story




AFib Survivor: Frank Slootman's Story












3:57 








Breakthrough Afib Care Offered at Stanford Health Care
                            


Play Video | 3:57
















Breakthrough Afib Care Offered at Stanford Health Care




Breakthrough Afib Care Offered at Stanford Health Care




















Treatments by Condition







We offer seamless care for all arrhythmias, no matter how complex or rare, including specialized care for athletes and people with inherited conditions. Learn more about our treatments for these conditions:








Supraventricular arrhythmias

Atrial fibrillation (AFib)
Atrial flutter
Atrial tachycardia
Atrioventricular nodal reentrant tachycardia (AVNRT)
Atrioventricular reentrant tachycardia
Paroxysmal supraventricular tachycardia (PSVT)
Supraventricular tachycardia (SVT)
Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome

Ventricular arrhythmias

Ventricular fibrillation (VFib)
Ventricular tachycardia (VT)
Torsades de pointes
Premature ventricular beats (PVCs)

Inherited arrhythmias

Brugada syndrome
Catecholaminergic polymorphic ventricular tachycardia (CPVT) 
Long QT syndrome








Bradycardias

Heart block
Sick sinus syndrome

Cardiomyopathy

Amyloid cardiomyopathy
Arrhythmogenic right ventricular dysplasia/cardiomyopathy (ARVD/C)
Familial dilated cardiomyopathy
Heart failure

Heart valve disease
Hypertrophic cardiomyopathy
Ischemic cardiomyopathy
Marfan syndrome
Nonischemic cardiomyopathy
Sarcoidosis

Cardiac arrest


















All Treatments







Our arrhythmia team is internationally known as thought leaders in all aspects of arrhythmia treatment. Our specialized expertise includes:








Catheter ablation 
This therapy helps regulate heart rate and rhythm by disrupting abnormal electrical pathways through the heart. We offer these types of ablation:

Ablation by energy sources
Cryoablation
Radiofrequency ablation


Ablation with mapping technology: FIRM ablation 
Epicardial ablation

Surgery for arrhythmia
Depending on the type of arrhythmia you have, open-heart surgery may be your best option. Our expert surgeons perform these surgical procedures for arrhythmias:

Hybrid surgical-catheter ablation
Atrial fibrillation surgery (MAZE)

Genetic counseling
Our genetic counselors in the Center for Inherited Cardiovascular Disease can assess your risk for an inherited arrhythmia and work closely with you to develop a care plan for you and your family.







Medical management for arrhythmia
If you have an arrhythmia but your symptoms are not severe, we may be able to treat you with medications. Depending on your symptoms and other health factors, you may need medications to control your heart rate, your heart rhythm, or both, such as:

Anti-arrhythmic agents 
Medications for rate control

Devices that treat arrhythmia
For serious arrhythmias, you may need a device to control your heart rate and rhythm. We implant these devices in your chest using minimally invasive procedures:

Implantable cardioverter-defibrillator (ICD) 
Pacemaker 
Cardiac resynchronization therapy (CRT) 
Lead and device extraction 



















Clinical Trials














0
Open Clinical Trials
View All »









Our arrhythmia team is instrumental in national clinical trials that study the latest developments in arrhythmia diagnosis and treatment. Our research interests include pacemakers that can slow the progression of heart failure and ablation procedures for advanced atrial fibrillation. Learn more about clinical trials for arrhythmia.
Open trials refer to studies currently recruiting participants or that may recruit participants in the near future. Closed trials are not currently enrolling, but similar studies may open in the future.
To learn more about the clinical trials we offer, contact Gerri O'Riordan at 650-725-5597.













View Closed Clinical Trials for Cardiac Arrhythmia Service »
















Your Arrhythmia Care Team
Our arrhythmia team brings together expertise from several heart specialties to diagnose and treat electrical activities of the heart that cause arrhythmia. Our close collaboration with cardiologists and cardiac surgeons means that you receive comprehensive care for any heart condition.









Your Doctors







Cardiac Electrophysiologist
 Cardiac electrophysiologists specialize in diagnosing and treating disturbances of the heart’s electrical system. They evaluate arrhythmias (abnormal heart rhythms) to help determine the right treatment for you. They will be the first doctor you see, and they will oversee all aspects of your care, from diagnosis to treatment to follow-up care.
View All {0} Cardiac Electrophysiologists »





Cardiothoracic Surgeon
 Cardiothoracic surgeons with expertise in treating arrhythmias work closely with our team of cardiac electrophysiologists to help devise the best care path for you. The two specialists also partner on newer, minimally invasive techniques, including lead extractions and hybrid surgical-catheter ablation.
View All {0} Cardiothoracic Surgeons »















Extended Care Team













                Advanced Practice Providers
            



Many members of your team have undergone additional training and education to deliver some of the same care as doctors. They work closely with your surgeon or electrophysiologist.







ADVANCED PRACTICE PROVIDERS












                                                Lori Henry, NP
                                            

                                                Nurse Practitioner
                                            








                                                Lori Henry, NP
                                            

                                                Nurse Practitioner
                                            














                                                Crystaljade Lau, RN, MS, CNS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            








                                                Crystaljade Lau, RN, MS, CNS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            














                                                Aimee Lee, CNS, ACNP-BC
                                            

                                                Nurse Practitioner
                                            








                                                Aimee Lee, CNS, ACNP-BC
                                            

                                                Nurse Practitioner
                                            














                                                May Marquez, CNS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            








                                                May Marquez, CNS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            














                                                Kim Nguyen, CNS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            








                                                Kim Nguyen, CNS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            














                                                Linda K. Ottoboni, RN, CNS, CCDS, FHRS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            








                                                Linda K. Ottoboni, RN, CNS, CCDS, FHRS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            














                                                Kara Rainusso, MS, RN, ACNP-BC
                                            










                                                Kara Rainusso, MS, RN, ACNP-BC
                                            
















                                                Christine Tacklind, MS, CNS, ACNP-BC, CCRN
                                            

                                                Nurse Practitioner
                                            








                                                Christine Tacklind, MS, CNS, ACNP-BC, CCRN
                                            

                                                Nurse Practitioner
                                            














                                                Angela Tsiperfal, CNS, ACNP-BC, CCDS, FHRS
                                            

                                                Nurse Practitioner
                                            








                                                Angela Tsiperfal, CNS, ACNP-BC, CCDS, FHRS
                                            

                                                Nurse Practitioner
                                            














                                                Mustafa Yahya, RN, MS, CNS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            








                                                Mustafa Yahya, RN, MS, CNS
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Specialist
                                            
























                Nurses
            



Nursing professionals manage all your care, including appointment coordination, sharing your test results, and providing treatment. They also provide support and education so you and your family fully understand your care plan.








NURSES












                                                Marcia Glassford, RN
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Coordinator
                                            








                                                Marcia Glassford, RN
                                            

                                                Clinical Nurse Coordinator
                                            














                                                Alisson Aguilar, PCC
                                            

                                                Practice Coordinator
                                            








                                                Alisson Aguilar, PCC
                                            

                                                Practice Coordinator
                                            














                                                Kaylyn Armstrong, RN
                                            

                                                Device Nurse
                                            








                                                Kaylyn Armstrong, RN
                                            

                                                Device Nurse
                                            














                                                Colleen Bonnett, RN
                                            

                                                Nurse Coordinator
                                            








                                                Colleen Bonnett, RN
                                            

                                                Nurse Coordinator
                                            














                                                Josephine Collins, RN
                                            

                                                Nurse Coordinator
                                            








                                                Josephine Collins, RN
                                            

                                                Nurse Coordinator
                                            














                                                Saira Gonzalez
                                            

                                                Procedure Coordinator
                                            








                                                Saira Gonzalez
                                            

                                                Procedure Coordinator
                                            














                                                Stephanie Lazaro, PCC
                                            

                                                Practice Coordinator
                                            








                                                Stephanie Lazaro, PCC
                                            

                                                Practice Coordinator
                                            














                                                Carlene Mallet, RN
                                            

                                                Device Nurse
                                            








                                                Carlene Mallet, RN
                                            

                                                Device Nurse
                                            














                                                Geraldine O'Riordan, RN
                                            

                                                Research Coordinator
                                            








                                                Geraldine O'Riordan, RN
                                            

                                                Research Coordinator
                                            














                                                Madonna Paulin
                                            

                                                Practice Coordinator
                                            








                                                Madonna Paulin
                                            

                                                Practice Coordinator
                                            














                                                Allysonne Smith, RN
                                            

                                                Nurse Coordinator
                                            








                                                Allysonne Smith, RN
                                            

                                                Nurse Coordinator
                                            














                                                Yi (Eve) Zheng, RN
                                            

                                                Nurse Coordinator
                                            








                                                Yi (Eve) Zheng, RN
                                            

                                                Nurse Coordinator
                                            


















Afib Prevention Program
The Afib Prevention Program evaluates patients for common risk factors, such as obesity, sleep apnea, hypertension, and diabetes, and works to identify approaches to treat each person's atrial fibrillation.
Device Clinic
If you need a pacemaker or another implantable device, our device coordinators will help you navigate the process before, during, and after the procedure. They provide education about your device, the implantation procedure, and ongoing home care.
Genetic Counselors
If you are concerned about your risk for an inherited arrhythmia, genetic counselors in the Stanford Center for Inherited Cardiovascular Disease can guide you through decision-making about genetic testing, family planning, and medical management. They also provide support and counseling to help you cope with having or being at risk for an inherited heart condition. 
Psychologists
Our psychologists are behavioral medicine experts who specialize in cardiovascular medicine. They provide behavioral therapy and other services to help people living with a chronic heart condition or a heart device, such as a pacemaker or ICD.
Research Coordinators
Research nurse coordinators screen candidates who are eligible and willing to participate in our clinical research studies. They educate you about the process you will experience during the study and answer your questions.














Support Services







At Stanford, we take care of the details so that you can focus on your health and wellness. Our electrophysiologists, cardiologists, and surgeons work as a team with device nurses, advanced practice providers, dieticians and imaging technologists to coordinate every aspect of your care. We also offer a wide range of support services to promote healing and improve your quality of life.









Case Management
Financial Counseling
Guest Services
Integrative Medicine (acupuncture, massage)
Interpreter Services
Lifestyle Modification Support









Atrial Fibrillation Risk Factor Modification Program
Nutrition Services

Psychologists with expertise in chronic heart conditions
Spiritual Care
Stanford Health Library



















Accessing Care


Our electrophysiologists, cardiologists, surgeons, and their teams provides their services in our center on Stanford’s main campus. You can access all of your care—from diagnostic evaluation to treatment to follow-up care—in one place.











Comprehensive Care in One Convenient Location

Parking and directions: Please click on the location nearest you in the map.
Insurance: Seeing a Stanford doctor is easy. We accept self-referrals and most insurance plans.




Comprehensive Care in One Convenient Location

Parking and directions: Please click on the location nearest you in the map.
Insurance: Seeing a Stanford doctor is easy. We accept self-referrals and most insurance plans.




View All






 





Clinic Overview
Cardiac Arrhythmia Service, led by our electrophysiologists, provides leading tests and treatments to help treat people with atrial fibrillation and other arrhythmias. Learn more about the care environment and the tools and technologies offered at the Cardiac Arrhythmia Service.













Arrhythmia Experts
Our doctors bring together expertise from several heart specialties to diagnose and treat all arrhythmias















FIRM Ablation
We developed breakthrough mapping technology to precisely target the electrical sources of AFib















Device Expertise
Our specialized team helps program implantable heart devices, check functionality, and record results















Support Services
Support services at every stage of care, including support from country's largest cardiac psychology program










Leading Diagnostics
We offer leading tests and tools for accurate heart disease diagnosis















Care Coordinator
Nurse coordinators help guide you through every step of your care journey













Frequently Asked Questions










 Considering Stanford











                What areas of clinical research and innovation are Stanford doctors currently pursuing?
            



The Stanford Cardiac Arrhythmia Service is not only dedicated to treating its patients with the finest treatment options available, but also to advancing those treatments. Clinical research studies may be sponsored by the National Institutes of Health, other governmental agencies, or industry.
We're actively developing new approaches to arrhythmia diagnosis and treatment, including:

New device development
New treatments and diagnostic techniques for Atrial Fibrillation
New technologies for catheter ablation
Integration of imaging in catheter ablation
New treatments for arrhythmias in cardiomyopathies (hypertrophic, ischemic, nonischemic)
New approaches to ICD and Pacemaker therapy
Signal processing and mathematical techniques for diagnosis of arrhythmias
New diagnostic approaches to patients with inherited arrhythmic disorders

We work with the Stanford Biodesign Program—an innovative collaboration between medicine and engineering—to develop new technologies in medicine.
Additional Research and Innovation Advancements

A Stanford doctor co-invented a new form of ablation treatment called cryoablation (freezing), which has been used in over 200,000 patients worldwide, including patients with atrial fibrillation and supraventricular tachycardia.

The Stanford Center for Arrhythmia Research has assembled more than 40 faculty who represent numerous disciplines and are collaborating to solve arrhythmia related problems.
Stanford doctors have conducted clinical studies leading to approval of the radiofrequency energy ablation system measuring contact force to improve ablation outcomes. Learn more about radiofrequency ablation »
Stanford doctors and surgeons were in the first FDA clinical trial to test hybrid surgical-catheter ablation, combining minimally invasive surgery with a catheter-based procedure to treat complex atrial fibrillation. 
















                What insurance plans does Stanford Health Care accept?
            



We participate in a wide range of insurance plans. View the list of insurance plans accepted by Stanford Health Care »




Have insurance or pre-authorization questions? The Patient Financial Clearance team is available Monday – Friday, 8 a.m. – 5 p.m., to answer your questions. Please call 650-724-4445 or 1-877-291-7335 (toll free).















                How do I find the right doctor for me?
            



When choosing a doctor, it’s important to consider the doctor’s clinical training, experience and expertise in a specialized area that matches your health care needs.
You can find the right Stanford doctor for you by using our doctor directory and filtering the results based on a medical category, specialty, or doctor’s last name. View a list of cardiac arrhythmia doctors »















                What support services are available for patients with arrhythmia?
            



We offer a number of support services for arrhythmia, including cardiovascular support groups, interpreter services, nutrition services, a Lifestyle Modification Program, integrative medicine, a health library, and a variety of classes and events. Learn more about our support services »















                Do I need a doctor referral to be seen at Cardiac Arrhythmia Service?
            



You can call Cardiac Arrhythmia Service directly to schedule an appointment with one of our doctors. Call 650-723-6459 to make an appointment.















                Is financial assistance available?
            



Yes, Stanford Health Care offers financial assistance for patients who are uninsured or underinsured. Meet with one of our financial counselors to find the best approach to paying for your health care. Financial counselors are available Monday through Friday from 7:00 a.m. – 6:00 p.m.  Learn more about financial assistance services »























 First Appointment










                What should I bring to my first appointment?
            



Managing treatment for arrhythmia is a highly personalized process. Our clinic receptionists will confirm the information you should bring with you prior to your first appointment. For your first appointment, please bring the following test results and information:

Electrocardiogram (ECG or EKG)
Holter Report or ECG Monitor
Echocardiogram (Ultrasound of the Heart)
Heart MRI
Heart CT
Your medical history
Report or results from a physical examination

You will also need to have the following information with you when you check in:

Insurance card
A form of payment for any co-pays or deductibles
One form of photo ID:
Valid state-issued driver’s license
Valid state-issued ID card
Valid passport
Valid U.S. Military ID card
Valid U.S. Permanent Resident Card


















                I need directions to the clinic. Where do I park?
            



The Cardiac Arrhythmia Service is located at the following address. Valet and self-parking options are available for a fee. For more information, please see Directions and Parking information for Cardiac Arrhythmia Service:








                    Cardiac Arrhythmia Service
            






Please plan to arrive 20-30 minutes prior to your appointment time due to construction near the main hospital campus. This will allow you plenty of time to park, locate your clinic and complete any additional paperwork.  















                How do I send my medical record to SHC?
            



Please print, fill out, and return the Medical Record Release Form to your new patient coordinator. The medical release form is an authorization form for external facilities to release medical records to Stanford Health Care.















                Can my family member or friend attend my appointment?
            



Always feel free to bring someone with you to your appointments. A family member or friend can help ask questions, remember the information your care team gives you, and provide support.















                What is the best way to get all my questions answered during my appointment? 
            



Write down your questions before your appointment and rank them in order of importance, beginning with the most important ones. If there isn’t enough time to have all your questions answered during your appointment, ask your doctor who you can speak with to get your other questions answered. 























 Current Patients










                How do I reach someone if I have questions about my care?
            


Current patients may reach one of our outstanding arrhythmia nurse specialists during clinic hours at 650-723-6459. For after-hours, reach the on-call arrhythmia doctor at 650-723-7111.














                How do I pay my bill?
            


You have multiple options when it comes to paying your bill.

Online:
You can pay your bill in MyHealth or the MyHealth mobile app, our secure health information tool for patients
You can also pay as a guest without creating a login.


By mail:  
Stanford Health Care Hospital Payment Processing P.O. Box 740715, Los Angeles, CA 90074-0715


By calling a Customer Service Representative at 1-800-549-3720, Monday – Friday, 8 a.m. – 5 p.m.

For more information about billing, visit our Billing page. 
Patient billing services at Stanford Health Care are provided by the billing office. To inquire about a bill that you received, please contact customer service: 
Stanford Hospital Billing
Monday – Friday, 8 a.m. – 5 p.m.
1-800-549-3720














                What support resources are available to me? 
            



We offer a number of support services for arrhythmia patients, including cardiovascular support groups, interpreter services, nutrition services, a Lifestyle Modification Program, integrative medicine, a health library, and a variety of classes and events. Learn more about our support services »















                How do I cancel or reschedule my appointment?
            


Please call our clinic receptionists at 650-723-6459. They are available Monday through Friday, 8:30 a.m. to 5 p.m. to help you reschedule or cancel your appointment. 














                How do I know if a Clinical Trial is right for me?
            



To determine if a clinical trial is right for you, talk to your doctor. He or she can refer you to a research coordinator for more information on studies that may be right for your specific condition.
You can also find the guidelines for who can participate in a particular clinical trial online. However, it is best to work with your doctor to decide the right care approach for your needs.
View list of open, arrhythmia clinical trials at Stanford »























 International Patients










                I live overseas. How do I access Stanford care?
            



Many of our programs are available to international patients.
Our International Medicine Services team can help you find the right doctor, estimate medical costs, book travel, and get you information about Stanford programs and services.



Please call +1 650-723-8561 or email IMS@stanfordheatlhcare.org to get started. 




















For Referring Physicians








HOW TO REFER
We can help your patients connect with the right doctors and services. When you refer your patients to Stanford Health Care, we will keep you informed of your patients’ progress.



Fax a referral form with supporting documentation to 650-320-9443.


PHYSICIAN HELP LINE
Phone: 1-866-742-4811


Fax: 650-320-9443
Monday – Friday, 8:30 a.m – 5 p.m.




Stanford Health Care provides comprehensive services to refer and track patients, as well as provides the latest information and news for physicians and office staff. For help with all referral needs and questions, visit Referring Physicians.



















 Learn More & Sign Up » 



Log in to prism




















































Cardiac Arrhythmia Service



,
            


650-723-6459

            Getting Here »
        















Home


Close


Doctors


Clinics & Locations


Conditions & Treatments


 Clinical Trials


Patients & Visitors


MyHealth Login










Healthcare Professionals






Referring Physicians






Nursing






Allied Healthcare






About Us






Careers






Newsroom






Make a Donation






Stanford Health Now















Close













